Dude, that mp3 is pretty unprofessional
Of course I care about the fans, and you in particular. We've met in real life, I even sought you out to do the chip-tune intro for episodes on my show.
So this blind-sided me. The allegations that I don't care about fans because I don't respond to email is horse shit because first of all, I have 64,325 unread emails in my inbox and another 24,060 marked "important." That's on top of getting messages sent to me on Twitter, Instagram, Twitch and 5 different Facebook pages that I manage. And text messages to my cell phone. If I replied to even half of all the messages I received, that's all I'd have time for
Anyway man, it sucks that the podcast ended. But there's nothing I can do to explain what happened.
As for your fan-art, we've had private conversations at length, I've commented on your work and given you enthusiastic feedback about your music, and even re-tweeted your fan-art making fun of me. I don't know what else you want. Pretty disappointed you of all people--someone I made time to come see while I was working on set--would post something like this suggesting I don't care about the fans. Trust me, there's a good reason for everything. And nobody is entitled to an explanation. Yeah, it sucks, but it sucks for everyone, not just the fans. Hope you enjoyed the show while it lasted
I can't believe that you'd complain that I never brought in your fan art after I brought in so many of your sound clips, spoke to you personally and even posted a picture of us together on the website. I've brought in more of your work on the show than most fans. Guess you forgot to count all that
Pretty disappointing man.
So what? That's because I get significantly more email. I don't have time to reply to everyone. Sorry man, that's just the way it is.
Dude, trust me, there was a reason for everything
Nobody is entitled to know
Things played out the way they did and it sucks, but leave it at that
DUDE. I POSTED A PICTURE OF US TOGETHER
How many other fans have I posted on the front page of the website?
I even hired you to do work for me
How much more do you want? Jesus
Good, it was a shitty thing to post about me
I'm not going to comment about it. Nobody on the show is talking about it. I thought you of all people would be on my side and try to calm these idiotic conspiracy theories.
It's not going to be better. It's over.
Dude, seriously... do you think this makes me happy?
Do you think I want to take a public beating like this? Honestly, stop and ask yourself if you were in my shoes.
I'm seriously asking you, that's not a rhetorical question
Exactly
So that means I must have a good reason not to talk about it, right?
Right?
Dude. Stop.
I don't owe anyone anything
There was a good reason things happened the way they did. That doesn't mean that the outcome was good. Nobody wanted to see this podcast end less than I did. It happened. Move on man... this is bullshit.
YES
No shit it's weird dude
But again, there's a reason everything happened the way it did
And no, you aren't owed an explanation
you aren't owed anything
DUDE
You need to read this: (not the defense of the shitty Ghostbusters movie, but the fan entitlement): http://www.avclub.com/article/ghostbusters-frozen-and-strange-entitlement-fan-cu-237139
Well no shit, who doesn't? Again, I'm not happy with the way things played out. There's a reason everything happened the way it did. No, I'm not going to tell you the reason. Nobody on the show is. And there's a good reason for that as well.
I thought I'd have you in my court to try to dispel some of these idiotic myths and rumors, not to fuel them. It's rare that I take the time to talk to a fan like this, so it caught me by surprise that you'd post something like that. I considered you one of my biggest fans
Would you like to help?
I'll tell you
Here's how you can help: just focus on the positive. This show touched a lot of people's lives. We all enjoyed it while it lasted. Lots of people were brought together and friendships were made over the years. It wasn't always smooth sailing, but sometimes partnerships go their separate ways and that's that. You can help by just being a calming force in the sea of vitriol. These rumors are all bullshit, people need to stop speculating and be more supportive of the people who brought you the content, not just whoever the forums like at the moment. I put in 10-12 hours per week on this podcast. More than anyone else on the show. I think that speaks volumes of how much I care about the fans. It really sucks that I'm getting beat up like this. A little bit of appreciation would be nice
I work hard to do what I do for a living. I put in countless hours bringing you guys content for free...
The new podcast will be different, but I can promise you this: I'm working just as hard to make it as good as possible. I just want to make good content for people.
Some people won't like it. Change is never easy. But it's sometimes necessary and we all have to accept it and move on. I'm just trying to do my best and deliver a kickass product. I hope people enjoy it. And if you don't, that's fine too, but please for the love of God, this entitlement has to stop. Nobody owes fans free entertainment, explanations, accounts of what happened or personal details about our lives
I'm just trying to do my best and I hope people like it
I wish things played out differently. We all do. But sometimes life throws you a curve ball you weren't expecting and people go their separate ways. It'll be fine. Everything will go on just fine. Just stop and take a breather for a moment... look at that subreddit: it's 1400 or so people who are loud, angry and vitriolic. They all have one point of view and they sound like a chorus of angry people, but they're the small vocal minority
If you hang out there, you'll get the impression that everyone feels that way
But I have 190,000 followers on Facebook, 30,000 on Twitter, 313,000 on YouTube, 25,000 on my personal Facebook and another 30-40,000 on all my other stuff. Those are the silent majority. They're not like these frothing idiots who have nothing better to do than to speculate about shit that doesn't matter at 4 AM. Be like the good guys. Don't add fuel to the fire. It's already awful. It needs a soothing salve more than anything. Not more inflamation
That subreddit will turn on you the second you have an opinion that doesn't match their hive-mind. They claim to be all about free speech, but only insofar as you agree with them. They're angry, bitter people. Don't be one of those losers. You're better than that man
Nah dude, we're good. It's all good
I just thought you'd be more in my court is all. I appreciate your support over the years. And I clearly have the most immense love of my fan base. I wouldn't be here without you guys, and that's why I work so hard to produce so much free content
I still don't have ads on my website for crying out loud
That means something
Sorry I couldn't explain any details, and sorry it didn't play out the way people wanted to. There's a very good reason for everything. We can't talk about that reason, but I hope people will still support whatever I do. I didn't do what I did to spite the fans.
It'll be okay man, just try to breathe and take it easy
Everything's cool
well your recording sounded smooth
yeah, and it was only 8-minutes long...
now imagine doing that for 90 minutes every week for 2 years
Lot of work, right?
You did that because you cared a lot about something you believed in, right?
You were willing to work for 2-3 hours making that 8-minute clip... that's passion. You don't get that kind of passion unless you really care, right?
I do that for 10-12 hours every week because I have passion
I want to make sure everything I put out is great for my fans
I do care about my fans. Quite a bit
I think it shows in what I do
well, it sucks, but I've been doing this for nearly 20 years. I've seen it before. I know it's a small vocal minority who don't have anything better to do right now. This needs to die down. The quicker the anger can be quelled, the better for everyone. People don't think rationally when they're angry
Again, I have over 500,000 fans across all my social media (313k + 190k + 25k + 30k+ 20k = 578k), so let's just be generous and say that all 1,400 people on this subreddit hate me. That's still only 0.2% of my fan base. Not even 1%
It's easy to think that they represent a majority of people because they're so loud, but they don't. It's not fair that they're trying to hijack this narrative. Trust me, there are two sides to every story and they're inventing a narrative about what happened that doesn't exist.
Right, because they're zealots. They can't entertain a thought that doesn't fit their political point of view. They're hardcore Trump supporters who just want to jerk each other off and reaffirm their world-views rather than consider an idea outside their political ideology. And for the record, Homeless Housing happened in Utah, the most conservative state, and was created by a conservative
Depends on when, but I'm pretty much locked in until my book is done. I don't really go outside much anymore, but yeah it'd be cool to kick back and grab a beer some day
Between my writing schedule, youtube videos, twitch stream, book, podcast and all my other obligations, it's hard to come up for air sometimes
(and that's how I get 90,000 unread emails in my inbox hehe)
well send more my way, I'm a fan of your stuff
anyway man, it's late and I've gotta run, but I hope you're still not upset
I know you still have some questions. We all do. Just believe me that there's a reason everything played out the way it did. It sucks and nobody is more disappointed about it than me
I wish there was more closure but it's the best we could do given the sudden ending and time frame we had
Thanks buddy
I also saw your reddit post, that was nice of you. Much appreciated
So now you know there were two sides to the story
And guess what... that's just the tip of the ice berg. There's so much more I could talk about. I just want to move on man.
dude that whole subreddit and his fan base are so toxic
Remember when I said I was trying to take the high road and just move on?
And I stayed silent for 4 months?
This is just the tip of the ice berg buddy... there's so much more
I just want to move on now
He lies about fucking everything
Um... you saw the video right?
He's not a character dude
It's not a persona
Yeah dude, you know Maddox is a persona right?
Thanks man, you too
Don't become a dick wart... that community is toxic
You know what man...
sometimes in this world, there are villains
And before I met Dick, I thought most people in this world had good intentions.
He has caused me to question my beliefs.
See what?
Wow... you unfollowed me?
Just sucks man. I feel like you've swallowed a false narrative that's out there. I wish you luck
I thought of you more than a fan because we met, but no worries man. Hope all is well
I don't follow anyone back because of my Maddox schtick, nothing personal of course. Congrats on the album release. Keep in touch. Later
Do you listen to Jesse's show?
Dax has done and said literally all of those things, except replace Brazilians with Mexicans, and "nigger" with "faggot." Only Brazilian isn't a race, it's a nationality. Anyone can become a Brazilian. Jesse was making a stupid joke as part of a long-running gag on his show. I disagree with it and I think it was unfair to attack Denzel. I spoke to Denzel about it and apologized to him, and so did Jesse. The only thing hurting my brand is Dax Herrera's constant slander of it and the dick warts harassing me, my sponsors and my livelihood.
Jesse's fans haven't put my girlfriend on a rape list. Jesse's fans aren't doxxing us. Jesse's fans aren't trying to take food off my table by harassing my sponsors. Dax and his awful fans are and have been for months, even before I released my video.
Enough is enough dude. Dax said that if a drunk girl passes out in a guy's bed, the guy who has sex with her isn't a rapist. Jesse has never said that.
Ugh, dude are you sharing this conversation? Please don't
Can you give me your word you won't share this? Please?
You promise?
I'm so sick of this. You guys are HURTING MY LIVELIHOOD.
Do you understand that dude? Nothing has happened to Dax. He has had zero consequences because I haven't gone after his livelihood like he has mine. He started it before the video was released.
And yes, his fans did make a rape list. And they put my friend on it. And my girlfriend. It's disgusting dude.
How do you know it was one person? And even if it was, does it matter?
Well it doesn't look like it
Because several people made a conversation on there. And I'm not sure if it's one of his fans or 10 of them, the fact remains that his fan(s) made a rape list and he and all the dick warts didn't delete it. Please tell Jessica that it's okay that she was called a "cum dumpster" who deserves to get raped and ditched in an alley that "don't worry, it's just one fan (maybe)!"
You don't have to listen to her sobbing next to me because people want to rape her
No dude. I didn't say Dax was responsible for it
Dax has spun the story to fit his narrative.
In the video I said his fans created it. They did.
Right, his fans are creepy as hell. They actually made rape threats against Jessica
What am I missing?
Asterios' ex-wife got death threats
His guest Lenore got rape threats
Listen to yourself buddy
You're defending a fan base that makes RAPE THREATS AGAINST MY GIRLFRIEND.
You know what the only appropriate response is?
"Yeah, it's fucking disgusting. I'm sorry dude."
This isn't a joke
We went to the police. Rape is a direct threat. You can't make a rape list, even as a joke
The fan base is awful man.
Look at what they're doing to me
Do you think they're good or kind or decent people who are trying to ruin my livelihood?
Do you think they're kind or decent people for making death threats against Asterios' ex-wife?
For doxxing people?
Jessica didn't dox Asterios. He's lying.
The only people who got doxxed are us and Kendal and Hyde
The fan base is truly awful.
You know dude, I've been doing this for 19 years
And NEVER has any of my fans made a rape list
His fans made one because he permits it. He has literally said a girl who gets raped should just "take a warm shower." And that a dude who rapes a girl in his bed "isn't a rapist, get over it."
Is that what you support?
Because I fucking don't. And I don't think it makes me an SJW to be against rape. My friend got raped a few months ago. I'm sick of it.
No way to verify what?
Yes you do:
http://www.menarebetterthanwomen.com/rape/
"A guy who fucks a drunk girl who passed out in his bed isn’t a rapist, he’s just a dick. Get over it."
I didn't even know about that article when I made my video.
Again, please don't share any of this. I'm speaking just with you. I'm not interested in fueling the drama.
Thank you
It's not satire. He told me it's not satire in real life, the first day we recorded Biggest Problem. He wanted to do it as Dax Herrera because that's how we recorded the 6 pilot episodes. Then the last second he switched and we argued about it for 45 minutes, and I told him "the only way you can save yourself is if you call yourself a satirist." And he said "it's not satire because I really believe it."
Even if you want to say it's satire, which it isn't because satire has to be making a point, and there's no point he's trying to make by defending a guy for rape.... but even if you do that, is it also satire to harass real women in real life, that aren't public figures like Ela Darling and my girlfriend?
Is it satire to tell Ela Darling to get AIDS?
And to tell her to eat shit and film it? Is that satire too? Against a REAL PERSON?
That's not satire
It's abuse.
So then when his fans jump on board and take his lead and make rape and death threats and take things too far, does he denounce it? Never.
When he sicked the job lynch mob after me, did he denounce it? No.
Put your sister or your mom or your girlfriend on a rape list and call it satire all you want, it's not. You don't know Dax. I do
Almost nothing he's said about me or the show's ending is true
Yet you don't seem to have the same double standards of verification for him
I've proved that he said that a woman who gets passed out and drunk at a party "expects" to get raped. That means it's her fault. And he has doubled down on that assertion. What more do you want me to prove? You still support the guy
Well not advocating rape and then saying that it's a woman's fault isn't compatible
Yeah and you haven't heard my side
Asterios falsely accused Jessica of doxxing him
Do you know what happened after he did that?
She got doxxed
And rape threats
And death threats
They know what they're doing
They're doing it so their fans do it to harass us
That: he accused her falsely of doxxing him, and that got the dick warts to dox her and send her rape and death threats. They even contacted her clients and harassed them. Fuck all of this. Fuck him and fuck the disgusting fans who'd do that
It's only coming from one direction: Dax's camp
Want to know something? I'll show you something but PROMISE me you won't share it
Asterios hates Dax
[image: http://www.wauterboi.com/peen/003_asterios.jpg]
There's a small snippet of one conversation I had with Asterios, right before I stopped talking to him.
Asterios thinks Dax is a sociopath
No dude. Asterios hates dax. He told me "dax is a bad person"
That's a direct quote
He said "Dax is going to be a footnote in your comedic career"
Direct quote
He said "Dax is jealous of you. He's a scumbag"
Direct quote
And he called him a sociopath and thinks Dax is psychotic
He's using Dax for money and Dax doesn't like Asterios. Dax wanted him banned from the old show. Now they're using each other to make money because they don't care about anything else.
I'm not asking you to switch
But you seem to have made up your mind based on not hearing my side of the story
As have most of the dick warts, and part of the reason I haven't defended myself is because they're truly awful people. I don't want them back in my fan base. They're all trump supporters who make rape and death threats and nobody seems to denounce it
And now those fucking hypocrites are going after my livelihood
Well you seem to be a fan so you think Dax's behavior is okay
I don't
I don't want anything to do with the guy
You've gotta stick up for your principles man
Right. I have
I'm telling you the truth
His own mom thinks that Dax Herrera is a character and Dick is who he really is
You saw that conversation he had behind my back, right? The one that ended the podcast?
Dax was one of my best friends. Do you realize how hurtful it was to read that he was using me for money? And he still is. The biggest draw to his show is still my name. He can't stop talking about me and slandering me. Do you think he's a good person? Do you trust someone who talks behind his friend's back like that?
The reason we're talking is because you're not one of them man. You're a good dude. I know you are. You're feeling cognitive dissonance because you know this doesn't add up. His fans are awful (not all of them of course, there are a few good ones), but he has done and said some really terrible things. And now me and Jessica and Ela and all my friends and family are suffering for it
No, I wasn't
Do you know how many tweets I sent about Dax after the podcast ended?
Guess...
No
Dude. That happened last month, and he's lying about some of that shit, and he PROMISED me not to share it
he gave me his word
I'm talking about before the video was released
How many tweets did I send about him?
I'm the victim here and I'm being made out to be like some fucking bad guy when I haven't done anything wrong.
Not a single fucking thing. Dax is the abuser and I'm somehow the victim because he's taking advantage of my silence
Are you sure? I don't think so
Dude that was when I released the video
Of course I commented then. That's the only time I commented with that account.
Why? You think it's weird to defend myself against lies?
It wasn't shared by two people. I created and maintained that group. He wanted nothing to do with it
In fact, that's why the podcast started to go down hill
I was doing 90% of the work
He wasn't doing anything
So? He's been slandering me and fans of the show wanted to know the truth. You're telling me I can't defend myself?
I posted that on the FB page of the show
Not on my Maddox account
So I can't defend myself there
The only place I can defend myself is in that Facebook group
How am I supposed to defend myself when people are only commenting about it there?
Well I haven't tweeted it there
Dax's story is one-sided
Yes he does
And by the way, I was responding to his bullshit, not his
Yeah, ONLY HIS
Well dude, that's fine, there are creative differences and there are 2 sides to those stories
But there aren't two sides to this:
1. He talked behind my back and said he was using me for money. He's not an honest person
2. He said women should expect to get raped. That's disgusting and victim-blaming
3. He hasn't shown me how much money we've made from sponsors. And he still won't. He has only released some bullshit spreadsheet and anyone can make one of those. He won't show me the statement
He's lying dude. The entire show was predicated upon our friendship. That's why the show ended after I saw that.
He has a girlfriend because my vindictive ex is fucking him to get back at me
She's obsessed with me
Well that's not how I work
I don't work with anyone who's not my friend on some level
And our show was based largely on our stories and hanging out together. The undercooked rice, bro downs, hanging out at bars and parties... we were friends
He ruined our friendship
And he's trying to spin it like I'm obsessed with my ex. That's fucking disgusting dude.
Want to know why I haven't talked about my ex and why that shit upset me so much?
Because my ex was physically and verbally abusive
She threatened to burn my house down
So if he brought her back into my life in that capacity, I'd file a restraining order against her and she'd lose her job because she's a teacher
These are two vindictive people who are trying to fuck with me
My ex got extremely jealous when I started dating Jessica
Do you know how disrespectful it is to suggest that I have any interest in that awful person anymore? How do you think that makes Jessica feel?
They were friendly, but it doesn't matter what I intend, I don't control people. I just wanted them to be okay with each other. Jessica was fine with it. They had hung out once before.
My ex lost her mind
And started stalking me
And the girls I dated
And threatened to cut down my Christmas lights
I still have a broken door in my apartment from her abuse that she hasn't paid for. So I'm telling you dude, if I go public with this, she loses her job because she's a teacher
Why do you ask?
No dude
I don't listen to any of his slander
I don't know what's been said
Fuck no.
I'm not listening to that bullshit
It's all lies
Everything he says is either a lie or misleading
What do I need to know?
hehe good luck
One thing you said though dude, "And I think that if he really thought all the disgusting things about women he wouldn't have a girlfriend." -- you know women are in abusive relationships all the time. Sometimes they put up with it for various reasons. So that's not true. My ex was abusive to me and I put up with it for too long
Probably none of it is true
I'm not going to listen to it dude, sorry I don't have time
I'll tell you what happened (the truth): My ex was there, she texted me a whole bunch before the wedding making sure it was okay to come, I told her it was fine but I was bringing my date
Jessica and I were still newly dating
My ex got really jealous because before the wedding she sent me an email asking to get back together, and said she was always going to be in love with me, even with new guys she dated
I told her it was too late and I'd moved on, but that we could still be friends
Then before the wedding she invited me to go to Mexico with her, I turned her down again and it pissed her off
Then at the wedding, Jessica caught the bouqet and my ex lost her mind, she got pissed
And then Jessica started talking about wedding venues
And my ex came up to me in private and said "where do you want to get married?" And then before I had a chance to answer, she walked away from me and started flirting with Dax
They left the wedding together which made me furious because she has a DUI and Dax was drunk, he could have gotten her killed and she could have lost her job
I bet he didn't tell you guys that part
But yeah, that's pretty much it. And she called me a few days later and apologized for it
Dax called me and said "if you want to kick me off the show for a while I understand" and I took him up on his offer, which is why he missed Episode 77
It wasn't because I asked him not to come. He offered and I took him up on his offer
He told all of that?
Because he made it sound like he was kicked off episode 77. He offered and I accepted.
Well I'm sure it's a lot different because he's a liar
But why would you trust someone who talks behind his friend's back?
Even if I'm a total asshole
And even if half the stuff he said about me is true (none of it is true)
He has made so much money off me and he has used me so much. Everything good in his life right now except for his day job came from me: his girlfriend, Asterios, Randy, his popularity, everything. Is that a way to treat anyone? To slander them and go after their livelihoods?
Dude
C'mon man.
He said he was USING ME for money and publicity
That's why I haven't talked about this
He's pulling a Donald Trump. He's trying to get me to refute his lies so he gets more publicity
That's all it is
You think he's a good person on any level?
After all the heinous shit he's said about me?
He said he slept with wives
You know who he slept with? His friend's wife
Dude, nothing he says is true. If you want to know the truth about anything, just ask
Eh, I don't care that much really personally. If they have a good reason to be Trump supporters, whatever. I think Trump is disgusting, but some of my friends support him for legitimate reasons. The ones who don't denounce him for saying and doing racist shit are the ones I have a problem with
I didn't care that much that Dax was a Trump supporter. I thought he was an idiot for doing it, but whatever.
Lemme ask you something: Do you feel that I included his rape comments in that video out of spite?
We were driving up to Valencia a long time ago and we got in a heated argument where he told me the same thing, only worse: if a girl passes out drunk, not only should she expect to get raped, but it's her fault
I had a huge problem with that, and told him to shut the fuck up
I even brought this up in time-stamped notes I made for a meeting on The Biggest Problem. So there's evidence that I've always had a problem of this
Well duh, of course they do. It's one thing to say that women should take precautions. We all should. That's not what he was saying
He said they should EXPECT to get raped. Nobody expects to get raped because then it's their fault
If you expect to get raped, then it's your fault.
No, you can take precautions
But you don't expect it.
When you get raped nobody says "it's okay, I was expecting it."
A girl can pass out drunk, spread eagle and with her panties off and vagina open but she still shouldn't expect to get raped. Nobody expects it or invites rape. Rape is not a thing you plan for.
It might be stupid to pass out drunk spread eagle, but to say you expected it means you're victim-blaming
You know what the cops asked my friend who got raped?
"How drunk were you?"
Doesn't matter. She was raped.
That's why this shit is important
and again, I'm not a feminist or an SJW, but since when does it make someone an SJW to be against rape?
What he said on his site isn't satire
Satire has to be making a point. What's the point he's making by telling women to just "take a warm shower" if they get raped?
What's the point he's making by telling guys that if you fuck a passed out girl, you're not a rapist?
What does saying a guy who rapes a passed out girl isn't a rapist have to do with that point about statistics?
You can't just write anything and have it be a satire
That's a joke?
"Hey if you fuck a drunk girl who's passed out, you're not a rapist!" ��
get it? You're not a rapist
And she should get over it with a warm shower! LOL
Why are you giving him the benefit of doubt?
Well Jesse has a black co-host
And had 4 black guests on his show for Christmas
Dax has a vindictive ex who's trying to get back at me
You know what I think? I think you're experiencing cognitive dissonance. You're a good guy with a good heart and a good head on his shoulders. You see all this shit: he expects women to get raped, he said guys who fuck passed out girls aren't rapists, women should take a warm shower and get over rape, his fans made a rape list, his fans made rape threats against Jessica, he told Ela Darling to get AIDS, Asterios' ex-wife got death threats. his guest Lenore got rape threats, and now they're attacking my livelihood and all of that stuff makes you feel uncomfortable
I don't blame you
Stand up for your values
Well you support him
And he's hurting me
And Jessica
And Ela
And lots of people in real life
Yes, because Dax had all his fans harassing her
And Jessica
But yeah, the fans are good people and not creepy assholes
Right?
You're trying really hard to justify this cognitive dissonance. They're attacking me dude
They're attacking our livelihood
The way I make a living
Just because there are some good apples in there doesn't mean they're good people. Good people don't harass stalk and abuse others
Dude, there are a lot of bad eggs in that community
actual white supremacists
Dax had a problem when I kicked them out from the old show
He tolerates them there
His fans dox and harass people
and make rape threats. The whole fan base is toxic
I know that's not you
And I know you're a good guy and there are a few good eggs in there
But look at the way they gang up on me and pile on with lies and bullshit and harassment
These aren't good people.
But you have a problem with Jesse saying "nigger... just kidding" and then apologizing directly to Denzel?
That show wasn't on my network
It has nothing to do with Madcast Media
You know he does 3 shows right?
And only one of them is on my network
They're slandering me
Yes
Cool, glad you spend your time talking to racists :)
Dude
I love you man
But you need to understand something: Dax is doing this for publicity
Every time there's drama, his patreon bucks go up
You're being played
That's why I'm staying silent
He's got nothing without me. Nobody knows who he is or cares
His numbers are fake too
Look:
[this is just a screenshot of chrome freaking out saying that thedickshow.com has malware]
He changed servers because his got hacked
Then he sent out all his episodes again
No podcast gets 200,000 downloads in a month without being in iTunes top 10
He hasn't even crossed iTunes top 200
Cool, well it comes at the expense of hurting real life people
Like Jessica and myself
[he sent this unironically http://www.wauterboi.com/peen/003_quote.png]
No
I'm not asking you to do that, I'm not asking anyone to
Listen to what you want, but please don't delude yourself into thinking these aren't bad people
If you're a good person, speak out when you see abuse
Speak out when they're sicking the job lynch mob after me. I haven't gone after Dax's livelihood. This is where he works: http://foundationdigital.com/dax-herrera/
I haven't gone after his patreon, don't care about any of that
His fans have gone after me and my livelhood
If you see fans threatening to harass us, you can speak out. It's your call
But just know: you're part of a group that are hurting real-world people
Again, you're rationalizing it
Stop dude.
You're part of that community.
Why are you hanging out with people who suggest fucky things?
The majority of them do
Look at how much we've been harassed
Look at the number of posts in there about me
Look at how much they slander me
Those are not good people
I'm sure not all KKK members would actually kill black people, or harass someone in real life, etc. But they're generally bad people.
That whole community is filled with negativity and slander
The signs are everywhere if you don't ignore them
Rape threats, death threats, Asterios' ex-wife being threatened, Jessica getting doxxed, Ela being attacked, Erin Tillman being put on a rape list, rape threats made against Lenore, Kendal and Hyde getting harassed, Cameron getting Doxxed, etc. Enough is enough dude. You can bury your head in the sand all you want, but at least acknowledge the fan base is largely toxic.
And now they're coming after my sponsors even though I haven't done anything. These are good people. Right.
No dude
They're great, they got harassed by Dax first
That's part of the reason I released my video
You guys are hurting a small business
And Dax attacked my developer, JOQ
Enough is enough
You're rationalizing it, but you know it's wrong
What if I started directing my fans to start attacking him and Asterios and you and everyone's livelihood?
haha well that's not what I'm suggesting of course, I'm just asking you how you'd feel if people did that to you?
Yeah the owner of the company got in there to sort things out and make it right. Bad companies don't care about their customers. They care a lot. They had a supply problem with one of their items and sorted it out
Right, it is shitty
Remember dude... all it takes for evil to triumph is for good people to stand by and do nothing
When you see people doing bad things, speak out
I'm telling you as someone who knew Dax for 10 years, he's become a truly bad person. He's done so much more that I haven't said to anyone.
Thanks
well look buddy I have to go soon
Almost everything said about me has been a lie, and I'm happy to clear it up
And you see when you asked that question, nobody answered. I talked to maybe a handful of people who asked and I made them all promise not to share the conversations. Not because I'm afraid of anything, I just don't want to fuel the goss and let him slander me more
Also nobody answered because I'm telling the truth
If I wanted this stuff to be pubic, I'd make it public. I'm not interested in giving Dax more content for his show because he's creatively bankrupt and has nothing else to talk about. That's why he talks about his crotch and blue humor so much. Everything is dicks / blow jobs / scat. That's all he's got. Pay attention to the number of times he talks about that kind of stuff
Anyway buddy, I'm out. Thanks for chatting, you're a good guy. Stand up for your principles and speak up if you see people doing something bad.
Myself included, if you think I'm doing something wrong. Thanks
If you're curious, here's what Jesse has said:
I was trying to make the guy I was on skype with uncomfortable by saying it as a joke, and it fell flat. That's why I've apologized to Denzel over it. It wasn't even directed AT Denzel, it was to make the other guy uncomfortable. That context is a bit removed without the video where you can see him cringe, but either way it fell flat.
I listened back to the clip, and I could see that in that context, it was a poor joke and didn't work at all. I agree I can and should do better (although nobody here is saying I can.) So while I don't apologize for saying the word (because that is ridiculous, and let's be honest, no one here actually cares about that part, that is just posturing) I do apologize for targeting a dude I don't know with a joke so lazy that it just sounds actually racist. In the middle of a 2 and a half hour show I had one big flop. Admittedly, sometimes when you talk for hours, you just say anything to fill the time.
He apologized directly to Denzel too
But I'm sure the idiotic dick warts will keep posturing and pretending like they give a shit about this to damage me because Dax keeps inciting them. This episode wasn't even on Madcast Media. It's one of Jesse's 2 other shows that he doesn't publish on my network
Well, dick warts I think are a disingenuous bunch. They're not fans of Jesse, they are just there looking for a gotcha. I don't believe anyone who supports Dax and all his bullying truly cares about the n-word taken out of context of a bad joke. That said, I don't support it and it has nothing to do with me or my network
I understand how it could bother you though because you're a decent person
Well I didn't know that he was until after the podcast ended. So there's that
Sean can verify. Dax is lying
I never called Dax a rape apologist. He and his fans did because he wants to martyr himself
Buddy you have no idea what is going on here
We're dealing with an actual sociopath
Please stop
Seriously, don't fan these flames
Please keep this between us no matter what happens
But there are people who are seriously fearing for their lives. Dax is a sociopath. Even Asterios knows this. Please stop
Full stop
I'm not joking. This isn't "goss"
I don't know
Why do you care man? Why do you care about any of this drama? You're better than this. I'm not a part of any of the new or old show's Facebook groups, I don't follow what's going on, I'm too busy with work and my friend passed away at 30 last week. I just went to the funeral last night. I've got real shit going on
You contributing to Dax's slander Patreon? How about you kick a few bucks to help with the burial costs of people who actually need it? https://www.gofundme.com/help-gian-molinas-family
I had to wake up to Jessica sobbing because people are attacking her
Dax is calling her a bitch, inciting attacks towards her
Asterios falsely claiming she doxxed him
So she got doxxed
I don't care about any of this pissant bullshit about facebook or forums. Real people are getting hurt here and the dick warts, Dax and Asterios are doing it. Nobody's livelihood was hurt but mine. Enough is enough
I didn't talk about Asterios in public. That guy betrayed my trust, I asked him not to share my conversation with him just like I asked you, and he betrayed me. And I'm STILL the bad guy?
Look how much Asterios has talked about me and Jessica! He's accused her FALSELY of doxxing him. So some dick wart abuses my trust and betrays me, and somehow we're morally equivalent?
If I wanted to talk about this in public, I would. I don't need to play telegram with dipshits on Twitter
Asterios is trying to martyr himself like he always does so he can make more money. He and Dax have become the same person.
How do you know my relationship to him?
And what does it matter who I talked to? Now I'm not allowed to talk to my fans?
I've talked with a handful of people about this, and I've asked all of them not to disclose any of the conversation
And what the fuck was so damning about what I said about Asterios?
Dick was my friend at the time, and he said he was using me for money. Asterios and Dax aren't my friends and they can fuck right off.
How did you find out?
So who spread that conversation?
Me? Or Dax, Asterios and that guy?
Exactly
Have you ever heard of the Barbra Streisand effect?
Okay... and they're the ones spreading it. The reason they're doing that is so they can victimize themselves because they have nothing else to talk about and every time they mention me, the idiot dick warts give them more money
I'm not fucking spreading this shit in public
No
Honestly I didn't
Because he gave me his word
He promised me
He's a worthless piece of shit liar and you're believing him
You gave me your word you wouldn't share this conversation
Yeah that Asterios himself spread
And Asterios did do something disgusting to Jessica
He incited a mob to attack her by falsely claiming she doxxed him.
Why aren't you worried about my girlfriend getting rape and death threats?
But you're worried about some pissant drama that he's flaming to make money?
No
But inciting a mob is disgusting
I didn't say that publicly
I keep getting betrayed and I'm the bad guy.
Cool.
Do you have a girlfriend?
What would you say if someone incited a mob against her that threatened to rape her?
Would you think that was fine, or would you think that's FUCKING DISGUSTING like that piece of shit Asterios did?
Just curious
Seriously, I'm asking you
C'mon man
You're a good guy, you know you don't stand for this
Jessica didn't dox Asterios
After Asterios claimed she doxxed him, the dick warts really did dox her and posted her private information online and added her to the rape list. People are going to get arrested before this is over
These are the people you're defending?
That's not doxxing
If that's the case then all the dick warts have doxxed us
Doxxing is against Twitter's policy
I agree
It is shitty and I told Asterios I didn't agree with what she did
It's shitty to post private conversations. I wish she hadn't, but she did
And I told Asterios that many times
But he's lost his mind and accused Jessica of doxxing him
That's not fair
Posting a private conversation and then accusing someone of a crime that violates Twitter's policy is way off on the balance sheet. She got rape and death threats
All Asterios got was exposed for being two faced
Asterios = two faced
So his ego got bruised, and Jessica got doxxed, harassed, slandered, death threats, rape threats, and people are calling her work. Let's not pretend there's some kind of equivalency then
Yeah buddy, that's why I told that guy that I didn't want to talk about Asterios
Everyone thinks he's this good guy and America's teddy bear, but he's really not
And honestly I didn't want to drag his name through mud
So that's why I was being vague, not because I wanted people to think he was sexually assaulting my girlfriend
But because he did the next-worse thing: incited a mob to do it for him.
Fuck Asterios. Seriously.
Honestly dude, I'm not perfect. I could have handled the ending of TBPITU better
I should have thanked Dax
But I didn't
So this is what I deserve? My livelihood taken away? Slander? Assault threats? My girlfriend being attacked viciously? Doxxing? Harassment for 8+ months? All because I didn't thank him?
Because Asterios was lying to her
She got frustrated
She did it on her own. I didn't ask her to. I don't control her. She is her own person and I'm not sure what she has to do with me other than we're dating
Again, I don't agree with her doing it, and it made things worse for everyone, but if I talk about this full story, lots of people's lives will be ruined
Her intent was to let people know that Asterios was being two-faced
I guess
I dunno man. Again, I don't agree with the move
I wanted to leave Asterios out of it. But he saw an opportunity to make money so he took hit. He doesn't like Dax and Dax doesn't like him
But they're bed buddies now because they're using each other to make money. It's as simple as that
Nobody harassed Asterios about it, and inciting a mob is exactly what Asterios did.
You don't attack someone "with the fullest of their abilities" because they slight you
You have a measured response and return in kind
Even my video was a measured response
I didn't even tweet it out
I didn't share it on my 200,000+ Maddox page
I didn't share it on my YouTube channel
I shared it on TBPITU FB page with 4k followers just so the fans of the show know
Dax re-tweeted it himself 3 times! Barbra Streisand effect. He doesn't care, he's using all of this drama to make money
Wrong
He dished a blow and I gave a blow back
Did you not hear him slander me for 4+ months before the video came out?
Did you know he attacked Kendal and Hyde BEFORE my video even came out?
My video was a response to his bullshit lies, I still haven't even told my side of the story
No it wasn't
How can you say this?
I didn't even fucking mention him!
Not once!
Not a single fucking mention of him!
ZERO
Not one Tweet, status, mention on my podcast, article, NOTHING.
ZERO
I did give an explanation to some fans who asked
It was posted on reddit
I told the fans it was because the site wasn't being updated anymore
That was Dax's job and he didn't do it
It would get the site hacked.
I did
It was posted on reddit
Then how was it posted to reddit?
Dude he was hyping up the drama to get money
Wake up
Megan Pennock even posted in there
saying she was helping convert the site to static html
It wouldn't be an issue if Dax wasn't slandering me and trying to make things an issue
The site had to come down
He wasn't updating wordpress
Well that may be true
But lemme ask you something
If you saw your best friend post a conversation where he was talking behind your back and saying he was USING you for money and publicity
Would you then give him more publicity by talking about him?
That's why I'm not mentioning him or talking about this
The only reason this seems like a big deal is because you're hanging out in the dick wart forums
Look at my Facebook page: nobody is harassing anyone
No rape threats
No death threats
Just good clean debating and jokes
People actually laugh and have a good time
I don't care about his patreon
Nobody knows who Dax is
The dick show isn't as big as he claims
He's faking his numbers, I showed you the proof
[The Dick Show stats http://www.wauterboi.com/peen/004_stats.jpg]
He's sending out his podcast over and over again to inflate his numbers.
No, I don't know or care about the Patreon
No he didn't
You can't buy a house in LA for that little
Here's what he's not telling you:
He already had a house that was gifted to him by his parents in Phoenix
He sold it
More lies. Anything else?
Dude want to know why else I'm not talking about this?
My ex... the night of the wedding... she had a DUI and he drove her home drunk. That pissed me off because while we were dating, it was a huge point of contention and I still cared about her as a friend at that time.
And I told Dax if he wanted to date her he could just talk to me, but I wasn't prepared to have her back in my life in that capacity
Because my ex was physically and verbally abusive
HAHAHAHA
Oooookay!
That's honestly pretty funny
But anyway
She was physically and verbally abusive when we dated
I still have a broken door in my apartment that she broke
She threatened to burn my house down
She threatened to cut down my christmas lights
She stalked me and drove by looking for my car
She stalked girls I dated
If he was going to date her, I might have filed a restraining order against her
She'd lose her job
Got it?
Pussy Dax knows this but he's talking about her because he knows I don't want to be vindictive. But if I do talk about it, I'm going public with all of it and let the pieces fall where they may. She will definitely lose her job
Because she still owes me money for the broken door and 1 year of back-rent
I was trying to normalize our friendship so she'd repay me
Do you see now that the truth is nobody's fucking business but ours and people shouldn't meddle in people's private affairs?
Well that's not the only reason
She was someone I dated for 4 years
I genuinely liked her at one pont and we had good times together
One of the last times we hung out, it was great... before the wedding.
But you're choosing to ignore the part earlier in the conversation where I said: "and I still cared about her as a friend at that time."
I'll cross that bridge when I get to it
There's a LOT more I have on Dax
He's fucked over a lot of people
Worry about what?
Oh well that's definitely hurt
He has hurt a bunch of small businesses
and us personally
Here's what I think is going to happen:
Dax is a sociopath, right? Those are Asterios' words
well because honestly buddy, it doesn't make me feel good
I don't want to ruin people's lives
They're trying to
They'll probably take things too far and end up in jail
I don't know what to do man
if I go full-steam on him, which is what he wants, he could get a lot of publicity that I don't want to give him
Believe it or not, nobody fucking knows or cares about the old podcast anymore. If someone tuned in to his show today, they'd have to look up me, Denzel, Jessica, Asterios, and listen to a year's worth of episodes to get up to speed
He's digging himself a grave
Well what if I drop the bomb and it doesn't wipe them out?
hehe
Well it will take Dax out
But his ex might lose her job
Dax's ex might lose her job or get investigated for crimes
Randy might lose his job, which I definitely don't want
Asterios will definitely lose his job
So then what?
You think these people will leave me alone after I've taken away their jobs?
Or will things get worse? I dunno
Yeah man... my hands are kind of tied right now
Honestly, I just want to get back to making content that people enjoy. I'm not vindictive. I didn't want to release my video about Dax. And there's worse... that video was originally 17 minutes long.
I'm trying to ignore this
These people are sociopaths and I want nothing to do with them
I was talking with a friend one night and we were trying to determine what we were dealing with... and we both did research and came up with sociopathy
Everything I read about socipaths online is this: Don't walk away from them...RUN!
yeah?
Have you dealt with some?
yeah
Want to know something? My ex had BPD (borderline personality disorder). I didn't find out she was diagnosed until the week we were breaking up (er, she told me, but I didn't know what it meant until too late)
The girl Dax is dating
80s girl
Want some more "hot goss"? She invited me to Mexico and I turned her down
So she invited Dax out of spite and that's why he wasn't on the final episode... he was in Mexico. Though I didn't find out they were shacking up behind my back until after the podcast ended.
My ex sent me this email before the wedding:
"For what it's worth, I will never feel about anyone else the way I did for you. It's not like someone will come along one day and I'll change my opinion on that. I know for a fact that this is true. Sorry I fucked everything up. I still do want a friendship with you, and over time this will get easier..."
She got pissed off because I started dating Jessica and got jealous, so then she tried getting back together with me after I'd moved on
So she decided to be vindictive and get back at me by sleeping with Dax. Honestly I hope they get married and have kids. Nothing would be more hilarious. I can't think of two people worse for each other... they'll kill each other (and that's not a joke).
One other thing though... about Asterios... I think he's a piece of shit and I don't like the guy. I have stuff on him to expose what a garbage person he is, but honestly... he's kind of suicidal. As much as I don't like him anymore, I don't want the guy to kill himself. I don't want to attack him. He's messed up. He has a lot of issues and he's being manipulated by Dax. I hope some day we can be friends again if he apologizes for all that he's done, but I really don't want to attack him, which is part of the reason I was begging you not to fan the flames the other day
Anyway, probably TMI
But there you go
Yeah... he likes to martyr himself
Count the number of times he brings up his ex-wife's medical bills
He brings it up a lot actually. He gets those sympathy bucks
I could do the same but I'm not
Want to know what happened the week TBPITU ended? My dad had a stroke. Then the same day that happened, my roommate (who Asterios introduced me to) skipped out on rent. Then Jessica's ex killed her cat. Then the podcast ended. And then I found out Dax was sleeping with my ex. That happened in the same 1-week period
Then 2 of my friends died a few months apart, the funeral I went to last night. Another friend of mine got raped on a production set and her grandma passed away. Another one of my friends had two of her best friends die within a week of each other.
And that's not even counting being back-stabbed and betrayed by Dax
So the end of TBPITU and all this shit doesn't even register in my top 5
I had a rough 2016 man.
And there's more... but I won't go into it.
Yeah... we make the most of it
Look man, you've got a good heart
Can I ask you a favor?
Well, if you see people attacking us, try to step up and quell the anger. It's being drummed up by Dax so he can make money
I haven't done anything wrong except not thank him in the final episode
My private life is not there for people's entertainment.
I kind of already did
But nobody noticed or cared
Well I talked to Rucka about this last night
Dax is a piece of shit and he's done so much wrong against me
He ended the podcast
But still, I should have thanked him, if only because it seemed bad
So to thank him publicly? Maybe
I'm not opposed to it, but the balance sheet of 8+ months of slander and lies is what I'm going up against
Want to see the email?
[http://www.wauterboi.com/peen/004_email.jpg]
He ended the podcast by talking behind my back.
Asterios said as much to me
Asterios said "the podcast didn't end when you sent that email, it ended the second he said those words behind your back."
He chose to end the podcast. It could have gone on without him and it should have because he showed me he couldn't be trusted anymore and didn't consider me a friend. Part of what made the podcast work was our friendship. All the stories about bro-downs, undercooked rice, dating, going out together... that all ended when he decided to fuck me over.
I can't work with someone I don't trust
And I don't trust Dax.
I'd apologize publicly for not thanking him if he chilled the fuck out a bit, but he's having a meltdown so he'll probably do something stupid like he always does and end up in jail.
Okay
I dunno, I don't know what he says about me, it's all bullshit, I don't listen to his show
The fact remains: he's not a trustworthy person
You know, before all the shit went down with Dax and my vindictive ex, I told him that if I were ever to get married, he would have been the best man
Have you ever been the best man at a wedding before?
I've been the best man or groomsman over 7 times and officiated once.
He would have been mine
Now I want nothing to do with him ever again. We will never be friends again.
As much as it sucks that the old podcast ended, it sucks worse for me more than anyone because I not only lost my livelihood, I lost a friend
Two if you count the..Asterios. j/k
But yeah
Dude. They put Jessica on the rape list
[http://www.wauterboi.com/peen/005-dox.jpg]
There she is being doxxed
[http://www.wauterboi.com/peen/005-rlist.jpg]
There she is on the rape list
[http://www.wauterboi.com/peen/005-dox2.jpg]
There are dick warts doxxing Cameron
REAL DOXXING, not Asterios' fake fucking ego bruise bullshit
[http://www.wauterboi.com/peen/005-dox3.jpg]
There they are harassing his girlfriend
Here they are trying to hack into Jessica's account shortly after they made the threat to on 8chan:
[http://www.wauterboi.com/peen/005-hack.jpg]
[http://www.wauterboi.com/peen/005-asterios.jpg]
There's Asterios' ex-wife getting threats
[http://www.wauterboi.com/peen/005-targeted_harassment.jpg]
Here's the type of targeted harassment I'm receiving from dick warts
This is only coming from one side: TDS. I'm not tweeting about, talking about or harassing Dax. This is what the dick warts are doing constantly, and what they've been doing even before the video was released.
Enough is enough. These idiots are going to get someone killed.
Well the video I stand behind 100%. He expressed those sentiments to me in private in a much worse way, and he also told me and a guest that his mom thinks Dick is who he is and Dax is the character. It's not a joke or a ruse. And if anyone thinks I did that video just to hurt Dax, I stayed quiet for 4 months while he slandered me and when he finally attacked my sponsors, I had no choice but to release it. I even have time-stamped notes from a meeting with Randy where I brought up the rape comments to him. I warned him back when the show was still going not to say shit like that but he ignored me.
Maddox is a character. George is not. Whatever Maddox says on the air is obviously mostly bullshit, but I stand behind that video. The fans did create a rape list. They did harass my girlfriend and they did put Erin Tillman on the rape list. Enough is enough.
I didn't call Dax a rape apologist, you guys did. He used those words, not me. He wrote an article on his website saying a guy who fucks a drunk and passed out woman isn't a rapist. What am I missing here?
If you think this shit isn't serious, look at this comment on his rape article:
"I tried to kill myself because of rape and sexual harassment a little over a year ago. I don't understand why you think rape is funny. It kills people. To this day I still wish they would have just killed me. No, they had to let me live. My life is destroyed because of what those men did. I will never trust again or be happy. I want to die but I can't. I'm not strong enough to kill myself. I'm not strong enough to finish the job. They know I'm too weak to take my own life so that's why they made me live. I will be tortured for the rest of my life by them. The day God takes me home naturally, which I hope and pray he does soon, is the day I will be free."
I warned him 3 times before the podcast ended not to ever mention that rape shit to me and he still did. Then he had the audacity to complain about me editing shit out of the show. Fuck that. He said what he said and he doubled down.
The one thing I will apologize for is not mentioning him on the final episode. That was legitimately wrong. He has done far far far worse things to me and my reputation, and he owes me tons of apologies, but it wasn't my place to punish him like that.
But on the balance sheet, he has affected my livelihood, I haven't affected his (negatively anyway). He has harassed me for 8 months, I haven't harassed him. He has incited rape and death threats along with Asterios, I have done no such thing to him. He's a truly awful person. Just look at how often he slanders me... every fucking day.
I wish Dax and Asterios were more concerned about the women their awful fans are attacking than their shitty bruised egos. It's time they get over it and grow the fuck up before someone gets hurt or killed.
That fan base is toxic dude.
And if you want proof Dax attacked my sponsors, here you go, from August 27. I released my video 1 month later on September 26: https://twitter.com/dickmasterson/status/769450830630047745
Nice job lynch mob.
And you haven't seen him attack women?
[http://www.wauterboi.com/peen/005-women.jpg]
[http://www.wauterboi.com/peen/005-women2.jpg]
[http://www.wauterboi.com/peen/005-women3.jpg]
Yeah seems like a great guy.
Don't get played dude. This is the guy you're defending as being decent?
Asterios needs to publicly state that people need to stop sending rape and death threats to Jessica and that she did not dox him. He incited these attacks. I agree that Jessica shouldn't have posted that comment. I talked with her about it, but to accuse her of a crime she didn't commit and inciting a mob against her is disgusting. The worst that happened to Asterios is that he got exposed for being 2-faced. He didn't have to sob himself to sleep because people were threatening to rape him and calling his work to harass him
All of this started because of Dick. He talked behind my back like a fucking asshole, hid financial records from me and slandered me for 4 months. I have a right to defend myself and everything I released in that video is 100% true. He should spend less time worrying about his shitty reputation and more time worrying about his toxic fan base making rape lists. I've done this for 19 years and never had a rape list created by my fans. It's fucking disgusting. And I mean that with every ounce of my being. I don't think it makes me an SJW to be against rape.
Dax will never go back to UCB. He attacked them publicly and attacked all the women at UCB on his show. He's gone for life not because of that video, but because of what HE did and said.
Well he said it on air, so I don't know what I need to defend
He said it in writing too
So there you go
I don't want to have anything to do with him. I've moved on
What am I trying to prove?
I don't stand for what he believes in. I don't care about any after-the-fact bullshit explanation he's saying to cover his ass.
Dax attacked Jessica on air before I released that video
He attacked me
He attacked my sponsors
Fuck him
I feel like you're going to try to rationalize anything I tell you because you've made up your mind based on his lies
Almost everything he has said about me is a lie.
Thanks buddy
I appreciate that. I'm not sure what I need to defend myself against. I'm allowed to disagree with the point of view that women should expect to get raped
Maybe
But here's what I'm concerned with:
Dax is a sociopath (for real)
You know Lowtax?
Cool... well did you know he and I feuded a while back? Back in 2002
I thought some of his writers were ripping me off. Turns out I was wrong, and I apologized
But he went on the attack
And got his whole forum to attack me
I apologized to him and made it clear on his forums that I apologized to him as well
But they still attacked me ruthlessly
So finally it died down
And years later when Hurricane Katrina happened, his servers got flooded
And this is the email I sent him:
[http://www.wauterboi.com/peen/005-lowtax.jpg]
That's the last time I talked with him. And today he's STILL attacking me. He's still calling me a faggot and saying he hates my guts
STILL
So what happens if I apologize and Dax takes it as a mandate for all the lies he said about me, and then continues the attack?
Who knows... but right now I haven't had an opportunity to apologize, and he has way more to apologize for.
He can start by what ended the podcast: talking behind my back and using me.
You know, I thought about what you said...
about how that email ended the podcast... but I think I disagree. I think actions can end things more than words. If you do something to get you fired, your boss ultimately fires you, but it's your actions that did it, you know?
heh
Well look man, I've known Dax for 10 years
or I thought I did
and I don't know him anymore. He's changed. He is all Dick and no Dax.
If I didn't believe that video's sentiments, I wouldn't have released it
I have a lot more to say about what a scumbag he is, but I refrained. That video was measured and reserved. He's said and done a lot of shitty things
He slept with his friend's wife dude.
His FRIEND
No, it's cached
There are dozens of servers that load my content. But depending on the request, it's cached from one of the many CDNs.
You guys going to harass libsyn now too?
Why won't the dick warts move the fuck on? I haven't done anything wrong. Jesus, you're listening to a man who brags about sleeping with people's wives and hanging out in a community that makes rape and death threats regularly. Enough is enough with this shit. You guys are harassing my sponsors, my friends and my guests. Enough dude.
And Kendal and Hyde
and Harry's
and Casper
Time for everyone to fuck off
You guys are trying to kill my livelihood. I didn't go after Dax's livelihood. If he thinks the video was so damaging, maybe he shouldn't have re-tweeted it 3 times. He's playing the dick warts like a fiddle.
Apologize for what?
Dax is the aggressor
He ended the podcast by being unprofessional
He slandered me for 4 months
Falsely accused me of hijacking the feed
Attacked my girlfriend on the air
And I'm the bad guy?
Seriously?
While I've stayed quiet for 4 months?
Okay dude.
Well you're wrong
List the things I did wrong before the podcast ended:
Go ahead.
What happened after was Dax slandered me for 4 months
And attacked my sponsors
AND I'M THE BAD GUY!
Insane.
Seriously, go fucking look at the number of tweets he made about me after it ended
All slanderous
It's insane because what you're saying isn't true. I didn't attack him, he attacked me first
He went after my sponsors
That's a fact.
No I don't, and no I didn't. Before that video I hadn't said one thing about him
While he continuously lied about me
Do you have ANY PROOF?
Show me how I attacked him or said ANYTHING about him before that video
One tweet
One status update
One word about him
Go on, I'm waiting
I'm not listening to his show, can you summarize in a sentence?
And again, this is supposed to be proof that *I* said something about him before the video was released... not sure how you quoting him is proving that I said anything. He's proven himself to be a liar.
Oh right, so someone leaks a private conversation. That's not a public statement. And I'M STILL THE BAD GUY! People abuse my privacy and I'm the bad guy! Unbelievable
And guess what? People are free to imagine anything they want anyway. People were speculating everything from Dick fucking my girlfriend to killing my mother on the forums BEFORE that statement
So please spare me this bullshit about how that was some damaging thing I said.
It wasn't.
Talking behind your FRIEND's backs and saying you're using them. Yes. Dax isn't my friend anymore and I wasn't talking behind his back. I was explaining very succinctly to the fan that if I told my side of the story, it would hurt his reputation. And guess what? It did.
I told the truth and turns out I was right, wasn't I?
The truth is he's a scumbag who says it's a woman's fault if she gets raped because she's drunk. Fuck that.
And somehow I'm still the bad guy
Even when someone clearly fucking violates my privacy
I'M ALWAYS THE BAD GUY!
I did explain it
You guys are choosing not to listen to it
Randy explained it too
Randy texted me and said "hey man, do you want me to explain what happened on Reddit?" I said "I don't think they'll believe it, but go for it." And he told the truth
and guess what? MADDOX IS THE BAD GUY!
That's a common theme with that toxic fan base
I can do NOTHING right
I'm a man with integrity who has produced content and served it ad-free on my website for 19 fucking years because of a promise I've made. And you're doubting me over a man who brags about sleeping with married women. OOOOokaaayy!
I tried to protect Asterios from the ugly truth: he incited a mob that caused my girlfriend to get rape threats.... and guess what? I'm the bad guy!
He's not a content creator, he's a slanderous asshole and a sociopath who will hurt everyone around him.
I'm not trying to do anything
That wasn't supposed to be a public statement
That guy violated my trust and broke his word to not share those details
BUT I'M THE BAD GUY!
Got it.
If someone fucks me over, I'm the bad guy. If I say anything: I'm the bad guy. If I do anything at all, I'm the bad guy. Cool.
I'm the one who needs to stop talking to fans about them? When they tweet to fans about me IN PUBLIC non-stop, week after week? Seriously?
I already admitted I ended things badly in that email
Jesse apologized to Denzel, how did that turn out?
These people don't want an apology
They want to destroy
They're not good people. They want to harass and intimidate and threaten
They're fucking cowards and scumbags.
I responded to 4 months of harassment
Enough is enough.
I admitted I have flaws
They're taking the maddox character way too seriously. You guys are Hurting real people
Dax had my friend on his show
And slandered me and told all sorts of lies before that video came out
My friend came up to me and was shocked, and I had to tell him none of it was true
He was trying to hurt my personal and professional reputation on the air to thousands of listeners. Fuck him.
He owes me and everyone a big apology
I can't talk to my own fans now? Seriously?
You think I'm the problem here? Look at his fucking tweets!
He's tweeting about me non-stop!
He's obsessed
He needs psychological help
I don't care about what you're a fan of, this isn't content, this is slander and harassment
And stalking.
I can't believe these idiots violate my trust and somehow I'm the bad guy for SPEAKING MY MIND AND TRYING TO DEFEND MYSELF
Fuck that dude.
This is sick. That whole fan base is full of harassers. You guys are hurting real people with feelings. Those idiots don't even seem to realize that Maddox is a character
They're going after my fucking livelihood
If I defend myself, I'm wrong. If I stay silent, I'm wrong. If I make a public statement, I'm wrong. Got it. Only dick is the right one. He's a good person who sleeps with people's wives, calls women fat, harasses private people and he's the one who doesn't need to apologize. Cool.
You seem to believe his lies.
I don't want you to talk shit about him.
I don't care about him.
I just want to be left alone. This is harassment
I endured 4 months of slander BEFORE that video was released
Dax lied about the feed, he lied about the finances, he lied about my ex, he lied about our friendship, he lied about the site being deleted, he lied about wordpress, he lies about everything.
Okay let's hear it
Okay, but if it involves me, can you please show me first?
I'd like to see
Sure
Dude
You paint this picture like it's a tit-for-tat spat. It's not
I've endured 8 months of this shit
I've lost sponsors
I lost my livelihood
What has he lost? Jack shit. UCB = hobby, not a fucking job. He hasn't lost anything monetary. Period.
And he has tweeted about me literally hundreds of times, mentioned me on his podcast for hours, and slandered me
I don't like that this makes it seem like we're responding to each other. I'm not. And having a few private conversations leaked isn't nearly equivalent to months of slander and harassment.
I won't apologize for the feed, because that was Randy's fuck-up. There's a paper-trail for weeks proving it. If I release that for proof, Randy might lose his job. Do you realize how much responsibility and pressure you're putting on me to prove my side of the argument?
And by the way, Dax re-tweeted the video 3 TIMES!!!
He had friends at UCB who were following him. And about 10 of our mutual friends re-posted that video after that. He got banned from UCB because of other allegations by women he's done shit to in the past. I'm NOT going to take responsibility for that shit. He got banned because of him. And now I'm the one suffering financially, not him. Nothing has happened to him. He's a liar.
What I will apologize for:
Not mentioning him on the final episode. That's all I did wrong.
I'm not apologizing for shit I didn't do, period.
You conveniently left off the part where Dax ended the fucking podcast by lying to me
Lying about me
Slandering me
Fucking bullshit dude.
I asked you for evidence of my wrongdoing the other day and you sent me an episode of The Dick Show.
Unbelievable.
How about fixing it so it doesn't sound like I've been waging a war against him
I haven't
I've kept my side clean
ZERO reddit posts
ZERO attacks of his personal friends
ZERO attacks of his livelihood
ZERO tweets
ZERO facebook status updates
ZERO mentions of him on my podcast
Can I get some fucking credit?
Let's not pretend that it's equal, and no, I really don't. Only to a handful of people I thought were my friends.
Jesus. It sounds like we're both waging this war. And even when I'm the victim of a leaked conversation, I'm still the bad guy because Asterios lies and claims I'm talking to fans to play telegraph
I'm not going to be painted like I've done anything wrong here. All I did wrong was not thank him in the final episode
He's fucking lying about me and saying the podcast ended because of my ex... bullshit. I didn't find out about her and him until after the podcast ended.
Because how the fuck are you blaming me for some asshole who broke his promise?
Seriously that's fucked up
Some guy VIOLATED MY TRUST and it's my fault?
You think I wanted him to leak the convesration?
What evidence do you have that I wanted that? Every indication I've given you is to NOT SHARE any of our private conversations.
Right?
So what makes you think I want ANYONE to leak anything I've said?
Well I didn't want to be used and lied to
He was using me for money dude
It's fucking disgusting. I thought he was my friend
And somehow I'm the bad guy again
I ask you one more time: show me evidence of something I did wrong.
Don't send me a clip of his show. Show me evidence.
He didn't ask that person not to share the convesration
I see no evidence of that
But you do have evidence that I've asked you repeatedly not to share this, right?
It does matter.
Because of intent
Okay, so words don't matter? Your word to me, your promise, doesn't matter?
And then he justifies the job lynch mob because supposedly Jesse "attacked" Denzel (not true, it was a stupid joke that he apologized for). So then his dick warts harassed me, Harry's, Casper, Candid and ALL MY FUCKING SPONSORS, as well as Jessica's agency, and they called UCB and flooded their phone banks. The fan base is absolutely toxic dude. I will not fucking apologize for a fan base that created a rape list. How about have the fan base formally denounce this fucking harassment? Let's not pretend that this is even REMOTELY equal here dude. For every 1 leaked conversation from me, there are literally hundreds of times he's talked about me. And I can't defend myself to a few fans in private, who promised not to talk about it?
I get it man, you're a good dude and this shit doesn't sit well with you
But you've only gotten a part of the story
And that website makes it sound like we both have our hands dirty. We don't. Dax is an asshole who's playing dirty. He ended the podcast with his deeds and his actions. He slandered me for 4 months before I released my video. He contacted Kendal and Hyde and harassed them on Twitter. He slandered their brand relentlessly on his podcast... and all of that was MONTHS BEFORE THE VIDEO. Fuck him.
How about he apologizes for:
-Lying about losing his job. He hasn't lost anything. He got kicked out of UCB for being a fuckwad to women, that has nothing to do with the video I made.
No they're not. They got harassed and lost money because of it. You don't know the context and you don't have all the facts. Kendal and Hyde are great.
Dude, before the podcast ended, he was talking behind my back when we were still supposedly friends
That's bullshit man.
I don't give a fuck if you think Kendal and Hyde has customer service issues, he harassed them on the air and directly on Twitter.
And the owners got doxxed by his shitty fans
And let's not forget Dustin's family got death threats too
So let's recap: Dustin, Asterios, Jessica, Me, Kendal & Hyde, Lenora Claire, Erin Tillman, Ela Darling... these are all people who either got harassed with rape, death or violence. And that fan base isn't toxic? C'mon man.
Well attacking them on Twitter and harassing them is a problem because it's my livelihood. He went after my livelihood, I didn't go after his. He still has his day job and his patreon
Okay dude, keep rationalizing that. You know it's wrong
They post constant harassment about me on that subreddit
All the dick warts constantly brigade my madcast subreddit
Everything is downvoted by dick warts
And that's still not harassment?
My fans aren't doing that
HIS are from his toxic community
Cool, then why is every other post on the dick wart subreddit about me?
"bantz"
Harassment
Fucking bullshit
Look at my madcast subreddit, every single post has some dick wart harassing us
Fucking enough
Fuck that entire community dude. I know you're a good guy, but people like you are few and far between
And getting a death threat on a game is different from someoen calling your fucking place of employment and you know it
Getting doxed is real
We got doxed
Asterios didn't
Dax didn't
I did only one thing wrong: not thank him. That's it. If you show me evidence of any other wrongdoing, I'll apologize for it. I'm not apologizing for Randy's fuckup with the feed. Randy already explained it and you guys chose not to believe him because it doesn't fit your narrative that everything I do is wrong.
It is when they encourage people to brigade and downvote
You told me to join the IRC channel
Someone sent me a screenshot where people were talking about me, and that 688as guy was going on about how he wanted me to kill myself
and they were calling Jessica a bitch and a cunt
saying she had flat tits
mental jess
Awesome community bud.
Cool well I have to wake up to her sobbing every day because the dick wart subreddit links to her account on Twitter for harassment
She gets called a whore and a bitch
And they called her fucking agency
So keep rationalizing it all you want, but you know it's wrong
You know this is fucked up.
I thought you were a feminist dude...
I'm not a feminist, I'm not an SJW, but I know wrong when I see it
That rape shit is creepy as fuck, and I want nothing to do with it
I warned Dax 3 times before the show ended that I didn't want him talking about that. He said on his own website that a guy who rapes a chick who's passed out in his bed isn't a rapist. There's a comment on that post from a rape victim who said it brought her to tears to read that. That's not a joke. That's not funny. That's not satire. It's not satire to tell Ela Darling to get AIDS
She's a real person with feelings dude
It's not satire to call my real-life girlfriend a bitch and a cunt and "mental"
That's libel and slander.
Look, I know you don't like Jesse from Pod Awful, and I'm not asking you to, but he did a video about this recently and he actually got almost all the facts right. I didn't even tell him most of it, he figured it out himself. He's a really smart guy. If you care to learn more about what really happened, watch his newest video.
Cool well you have the luxury to say that because it's not about you. But if there were an angry mob incited against your girlfriend calling her an ugly bitch in a chat room, I'm sure you wouldn't be so cavalier and dismissive. It's not "just talk." It's slander and abusive. You guys are being rude as hell and you're hurting a real person. So enjoy that community. Keep rationalizing it all you want, you know it's wrong. Period.
Well sorry dude, you guys are far too toxic after all the rape and death threats and brigading. That's against Reddit's TOS
Cool, then the problem will go away and dax will stop harassing us, right?
He's a fucking sociopath
I'm just one person
What do you expect me to do? I have deadlines and a job to do man.
If I responded to all of this harassment every time it came up, I wouldn't have time to do anything else
You guys already took away my livelihood
And fucked me over
What more do you want?
Nothing happened to Dax. He got his hobby taken away because he's a prick. Had nothing to do with me.
Why can't you guys just leave us the fuck alone?
I'm not talking about him
I'm not harassing him
Or his followers
Well add all the things he did wrong and then maybe we'll talk
Because I sat quietly for 4 months while he slandered me
I won't apologize for that video. It's 100% true. He said women should expect to get raped, which means it's their fault. That's fucking gross.
If that video was so damning, why did he tweet it 3 times?
I wasn't trying to take dax down
HE SLANDERED ME FOR 4 MONTHS
I was responding to the lies dude
I have a right to defend myself
He attacked my sponsor and my girlfriend UNPROVOKED
No leaked convesrations
Nothing
The rape bit was there because I was responding to his criticism that I cut shit from the show
No, most fans are reasonable
Most fans left him
You have blinders on because you hang out on this toxic forums
It's hive-mind dude
Everyone who dares defend me gets shouted down
hahaha okay
I have 200,000 followers on Facebook
31,000 on Twitter
12,000 on Instagram
300,000 on YouTube
and my podcast is getting more downloads
I lost my sponsors
that's my livelihood
But I have way more fans
His patreon dollars don't translate to fans
You have that impression because you've been brainwashed by bullshit on those forums. Everyone who tries to defend me gets voted down or shouted out of the community. It's a hugbox of hatred for me
What do you think Dax has done wrong?
Because it doesn't sound like much
I didn't say everyone around m3
Asterios called dax a sociopath
Asterios is constantly suicidal
Most of the people in my life are awesome
I have hundreds of friends
People like me
Nobody likes Dax except for his life coach
[image, explained below]
These are people who came out for a dinner I host every Christmas at a Chinese restaurant
I host it for people who don't have a family to go to, or people who want to spend time with friends on Christmas
I took that a few weeks ago
Right, I have done nothing wrong.
Except not thank Dick
I DON'T WANT THE DICK WARTS BACK!
Please please please please don't give people that impression
I'm serious, these are the worst people
They're mostly racist trump supporters who harass and make rape threats. No thanks!
If you add that shit about everything Dick has done wrong
And remove the shit that I didn't do wrong (the feed, etc)
Add all the shit that Dick did wrong
Harassed me for 4 months before the video
Okay well then you don't speak for me. That's not a fair or valid website. I have nothing to do with it and I shouldn't have to be blackmailed to apologize for something I didn't do just so you guys will stop harassing us. I'm going to the police honestly. Enough is enough.
I don't give a fuck about a community that believes lies about me without hearing both sides of the story
You don't speak for me. Asterios doesn't speak for me. Dax doesn't speak for me.
I told you what I want, and you're not willing to put it on there. So do what you want, that site has nothing to do with me. I'm getting law enforcement involved. People are going to get arrested before this is over. Enough is enough.
What you guys are doing is illegal
It's libel, slander and harassment.
Not you
You haven't done anything wrong
The people harassing us
Great
Meanwhile dax gets a free pass for inciting it
And you're still his fan
No shit!
Because they've been listening to a sociopath rant about me for 8 solid months
That's not normal dude
You know it's not
No, he DIRECTLY ENCOURAGES IT
https://twitter.com/dickmasterson/status/807287507188469762
He's rewarding people who harass me by giving them attention, retweets and posting these on his website
Cool, thanks. Seems like it's totally balanced now
And add the 4 months of harassment, where he accused me of deleting the website, harassed Kendal and Hyde on Twitter, and called Jessica a bitch on the air
And add Asterios' false claim of doxing
And add Dax calling Ela Darling a bitch and telling her to eat shit and get AIDS
And add Dax calling Erin Tillman a bitch
And add Dax telling the women of UCB they're all bitches, and inciting his fans to flood their voicemail with harassment
And add his job lynch mob
And add the part where he lied
YES HE FUCKING DID
ASTERIOS CLAIMED JESSICA DOXED HIM
Yeah, what private or identifying information did she publish?
That's not doxing dude. Sorry
Here's Twitter's own TOS: https://support.twitter.com/articles/20169991
-credit card information
She posted NONE of that. He wasn't doxed
If Asterios was doxed, then she doxed herself too because her own convesration was posted as well.
That's what doxing is
Dox = private documents
Well I'm still waiting for any evidence of my wrongdoing
Because that list on that site should be HUGE on Dax's side of wrongs, and have only one thing on my side.
Oh wow... that should cover it. Thanks man. I'll tell jessica so she stops crying
Dude don't make this about you
I won't sign off on this. If you want my demands, I'm giving them to you. Don't speak on my behalf please.
And don't speak on Dax's either. I know you have a good heart and you're trying to do the right thing
But you're giving people a false impression about me
I want nothing to do with it.
I'M NOT DOING ANYTHING
FUCKING HELL
Don't accuse me of doing shit when I'm not
ZERO TWEETS. ZERO MENTIONS
[http://www.wauterboi.com/peen/007-us.jpg]
I'm the guy who made time to come see a fan during my lunch break on a busy shoot
You are misrepresenting me and my community. Your website is only from the perspective of dick warts and what they perceive as wrong. You got ZERO input from me or my fans
I don't want anything to do with that website until it accurately reflects what I want, otherwise please remove the part about what I want from dick. It represents NOTHING of my interests.
That's not where my fans hang out
You guys have harassed and bullied my fans away from reddit.
This is a one-sided war with Dax firing all the shots
My fans hang out on Facebook and they aren't interested in Dax's one-sided slander fest. My fans don't know about this stuff becasue we're not obsessed with a podcast that ended 8 months ago. We've moved on. We're not slandering and harassing and bullying you guys like you are to us. We talk about my work and my podcast, not Dax or his
In order for you to even get my fans up to speed, you'd have to fill them in on 8 months of slander and abuse
If you want a consortium of my fans, I can put them together, but they're only going to repeat what I'm telling you. I'm the most important person who needs to weigh in on what *I* want, otherwise that list is irrelevant and has nothing to do with me or my community
If you stop spending so much time in that toxic forum, you'll see that normal people talk about normal things. Not this obsessive hatred of one person.
Until that list reflects me fairly, I want nothing to do with it. Please remove the list of my demands. They're not even fucking close. It's so unfair how I've been treated. Jessica shouldn't have to cry herself to sleep. That fan base is hurting real people. They should be ashamed of themselves. Fuck everything about this.
All I want is to be left alone
Every leaked conversation has been a response to something Dax has ssaid
You can't blame me for responding when Dax won't stop talking about me
Leave. Us. Alone.
He's doing it for money and it's painfully transparent to anyone outside of the dick warts
"tune in next tuesday for some more spicy goss!"
It's sickening
That's not true.
I don't ask Jesse to do anything on my behalf
Dax's ex-girlfriend posted my private information on Facebook
If you want me to stop talking to fans, I can do it in public. Would you prefer that?
Because then people will lose their jobs for sure. Is that what you want? And PLEASE don't share this conversation with Dax.
Are you sharing things I said with him?
Please don't share anything I said to you with him.
Yeah, publicly. It's awful.
NO I DON'T
STOP DUDE
I just want to be LEFT THE FUCK ALONE
Just STOP
I don't give a fuck about Dax
I just want to move on
He wont' leave me alone because he's obsessed
Look at the number of times he's tweeted shit about me
It's not normal dude
I gave him his start, I brought him aboard my podcast, I gave him opportunities, I introduced him to his girlfriend (my ex), I introduced him to Randy, I introduced him to Asterios, to UCB, to just about everything good in his life right now except his day job. And this is what I deserve?
YES
He doesn't have to respond to that. HE'S THE ONE FUCKING SPREADING IT!
IF HE DOESN'T WANT IT SPREAD, THEN HE SHOULDN'T TWEET IT
It's not justification, he already hit harder than I have
I lost money dude
He lost nothing.
He's the one fucking spreading it
Don't pretend like I'm the bad guy here when he wants this spread
it's more "hot goss" for him
Well no shit
I got betrayed
I don't talk to fans anymore
But I have in the past, and there's no guarantee they won't betray me as well. What do I do?
Just keep getting abused forever?
I'm literally not doing anything wrong. I'm clearing the record with a few fans and I get attacked for it?
There's only one thing I have to apologize for
How many does he have to apologize for?
"as well"
I'm the victim dude. He's the aggressor in ALL of this.
He ended the podcast
He lied about the finances
He lied about the website
He lied about the feed
He lied about wordpress
He lied about the titanic bit
He lied about our friendship
I get it man, but I can't apologize for anything I didn't do wrong. The only thing I legitimately did wrong was not thank him.
Also there's no guarantee he'll stop
He already looks like a bad person
He openly brags about sleeping with married women?
I know Peach
If Asterios wants it to stop, then he shouldn't fan the flames by sharing leaked conversations. He's actively encouraging the Barbra Streisand effect. He needs to be a victim so he makes more money.
Look, I fucked up
I shouldn't have talked to fans I couldn't trust fully
But I shouldn't be punished for it endlessly because of something someone else did to violate my trust
I could just talk about this in public
Then 3 people will lose their jobs
Is that what you prefer?
Look, I'll apologize for things I legitimately fucked up on, but nothing else. I can't make an insincere apology
So I'm apologizing for someone betraying my trust?
I can't apologize for that man... you're asking me to apologize for another person's betrayal.
I mean I fucked up in that I shouldn't have strategically. I'm a pretty trusting person because I'm trustworthy. But I'm the victim here. I didn't talk to any fans because I wanted this out there. I thought that guy was sincere when he said he wouldn't share our convesration and I thought he was just a concerned fan who wanted to know what really happened, so I told him. I never expected that shit-head to betray me.
Then Asterios and Dax will say "yeah right! You knew what you were doing!" and the dick warts get riled up again... I know how this plays out man.
They don't want this to end
It's their cash cow. They make money every time they talk about me. It's disgusting
Look dude, I appreciate the help, but honestly I'm done with this. I'm going to the police. It's time these people got arrested. It's against California's anti-stalking and anti-cyber-bullying statutes. People are going to jail before this is over. I'm done with this. I'm not doing anything to incite this. I've kept my side clean, and yeah some idiot leaked my convesration after he promised not to, but that's not my fault. I'm the victim here
And let's not pretend 1 or 2 leaked conversations is equivalent to MONTHS of slander, tweets and harassment
As soon as he stops talking about me, this all goes away. No more conversations with fans, no more response videos (and trust me, there's much, much worse coming if he doesn't stop), and no more harassment. He's keeping this alive entirely with daily harassment and tweets. He needs to stop completely. I'm not talking to fans anymore, I haven't ever tweeted about him or mentioned him. As soon as he stops, this stops. It's 100% carried by him and Asterios now because they're using my name to make money.
Yes, we have proof.
No, I'm not showing it to you because it's part of a police investigation.
It's not going to stop until Dax and Asterios act responsibly and stop harassing us and spreading lies about us. Every time he spins more bullshit about me, it incites dick warts to harass us
Dude, did you see this? https://twitter.com/dickmasterson/status/820322389611323392
Your community made a wiki page with threats, harassment, false accusations and names of private individuals. Unbelievable. You know this shit is wrong dude.
When Dax gives attention to shit like that, he's tacitly endorsing it. He's showing his fans that they can get attention for bad behavior like that.
That's why this continues. It's only coming from one side: HIS.
My video was a response to Dax's slander for 4 months
What about holding him responsible?
I didn't just release the video
For the last fucking time: he attacked Jessica on his podcast and he harassed Kendal and Hyde. I don't give a fuck if you thnk they're a good or bad company, it's not his place to harass them online.
I didn't say anything, they're his own fucking words
And his fans DID create a rape list
What am I missing?
Okay, I'm the bad guy. I didn't thank a guy for ending a podcast and fucking my ex and lying about my finances. So I'm the bad one. Got it.
Maybe some day when someone gets killed or seriously hurt because of this harassment, you'll see what I've been dealing with. I hope it doesn't come to that.
I'm done talking about this. The rest is going to be in the hands of law enforcement.
This harassment has to stop.
Every single thing I show you for evidence, you rationalize away
"well my bird has a wiki page!" -- your response to the dick warts posting private information and slander
Unbelievable dude.
You're a good person
I know you are
Stand up for what you believe in
Yeah i saw it too and they were talking shit about Jessica and calling her mental and flat chested and claiming falsely that people have STDs. That's slander.
I told you why Dick got kicked from UCB
women came forward and made allegations against him
You're choosing not to believe it
Suit yourself
I keep showing you evidence and you keep rationalizing
"well the rape list wasn't Dick's fault... Well Asterios' ex-wife only got violent threats from one bad egg... well Dustin only got death threats from one guy... well the wiki wasn't that bad... well Dick didn't actually mean to say that it's a woman's fault if she gets raped... well Kendal and Hyde deserved to get harassed because they have customer service issues... well the doxing on the Facebook group was just one person..."
I don't know what to tell you buddy
I'm done talking about this
Thank you for trying
I sincerely mean that
I know you have good intentions
I just wish you were more on the side of defending people who actually got hurt.
Nothing happened to Dax
UCB was his hobby, not his job. He got kicked out because of allegations from women in the community, not my video. He's lying to all of you.
But you choose to believe a guy who openly admitted to using his friend for money and sleeping with married women. I don't know what else there is to say to you. Good luck.
Hey man
Hey man, just wanted to say thanks again for trying
I know you mean well buddy
If you do decide to release that website, could you please not include my part? I feel like it misrepresents me, my fans and my position and I don't feel like encouraging Dax to "laugh from afar" instead of discouraging abuse is taking the threats we're getting seriously. It doesn't feel like a neutral website, since it even has "rage" (a bit from his show) in the domain
For the record, I criticized a guy named Rob Bricken, an io9 writer a long time ago and my fans found his personal Facebook page and started harassing him. Here was my response:
[http://www.wauterboi.com/peen/007-rob.jpg]
Alright, take care man. Thanks
'sup
Thanks
The harassment continues, in spite of the fact that I'm not doing or saying anything to provoke it
Nothing personal, but I don't want to talk about old podcast drama. I've moved on
Why do you ask?
Lemme ask you this:
Have I doxed anyone?
(even by your definition of "doxing")?
Then why am I being doxed?
A few zealous fans and then Asterios and Dax re-tweet it and spread it as wide as possible
So they're culpable.
Again, why am I being doxed?
Yes.
Dude, are you fucking with me? You don't see them re-tweeting leaked screenshots of conversations I had in private with people?
No, I'm playing by your rules
You said that's doxing right?
So you guys are doxing me.
Why?
Be consistent
Either Jessica didn't dox Asterios, or all of the dick warts have doxed me.
Which is it?
Okay, so why are you okay with Asterios and Dax doing it to me?
Or anyone for that matter?
That's irrelevant, I'm asking you whether it's right or wrong. What your'e suggesting is that I can never trust people again. That's absurd
You don't know what my relationship is with people
You're assuming things based on what Asterios has told you
You know why they spread these screenshots as wide as possible? Think about it dude.. if what I said was truly damaging to Asterios, why would HE and DAX try to spread it as wide as possible? Because they make money. Every time they mention me, their patreons go up. That's all this is about. You're being played.
Will you do me a favor?
Well I'm sharing it with you because I trust you
You're one of a handful of people I've talked to.
No, I'm not threatening anyone
I asked you to show me evidence of ONE thing I did wrong, and you couldn't provide it.
I'm still waiting.
Don't send me a clip of Dax talking. He's a liar.
We know that.
No, you haven't shown me ANY evidence of any wrongdoing.
Go ahead, I'm waiting.
You're not going to produce it because it doesn't exist.
I've been wrong.
I admit my mistakes
You didn't show me evidence. How you "feel" isn't evidence
How you feel is based on listening to two people slander me for months to make money
So how you feel doesn't matter. Feelings don't matter in court. Evidence matters. Show me evidence
Seriously dude, I'm a bad guy right? I did so much wrong... so show me.
I'm begging you for one shred of evidence.
No you haven't shown me anything
when I asked you for evidence, you sent me a clip of the dick show. That's not evidence. That's more slander.
Okay, show me evidence of some wrongdoing. Not how you feel, not your opinion, but EVIDENCE.
Okay, I admit that was wrong. I was wrong for not doing that.
Of course, you don't know all the facts leading up to it
But that's besides the point
We've already covered this. Anything else?
I'm not brushing it off. I admit mistake.
No, I'm saying that you not knowing the facts leading up to that decision is beside the point
Not that I didn't mention him
I admit that was wrong
Can you acknowledge that when you said "You can't let yourself be wrong man" isn't true?
That sounds like a line from Asterios
Do you think it was damaging to Dax?
I'm sorry to hear that
You do know that he tweeted it 3 times himself, right?
To a much larger audience than the intended Facebook page?
That's damage control? To spread it as wide as possible?
He didn't say it wasn't true. He doubled down on his explanation.
He didn't refute anything in that video actually. I pointed out numerous falsehoods and he just lied more about them
The one thing I'd change in the video is to expand upon the rape list part and make it more clear
And listen buddy, between you and I, you don't know why Dax got kicked out of UCB
It had nothing to do with the video. He wants people to think that so he can martyr himself. He got kicked out for much, much worse reasons... and if that became public, UCB wouldn't be the only place he'd be kicked out of
So trust me when I say I did what I did as a measured response to months of slander
Do you know one of my friends was put on that rape list?
How would you feel if your girlfriend was put on a rape list?
Well you seem to think that these things can just exist without repercussions
Before the video, you listened to all 17 episodes of his show right?
Dick wrote an article about why he thinks a rapist isn't a rapist if he fucks a drunk chick. How does that not encourage this kind of behavior? Maybe his fans are trying to emulate him. C'mon man, you can't say he has ZERO responsibility in cultivating a following that would create a rape list. Why hasn't that happened with me? Or Pewdiepie? Or h3h3? Or any other normal fucking human who doesn't write rapey shit like that? Wake up buddy, you can't just say it's okay to rape a passed out girl and not expect to attract some bad attention.
I WAS THE ONE DEFENDING MYSELF
You heard the 17 episodes of slander where he lied and said I stole the feed, deleted the website, told people I had no character, slandered Kendal and Hyde, called my girlfriend a bitch. What the fuck man? Seriously, I'm just supposed to sit back and take it? Fuck him and the horse he rode in on. When a fan asked me why I was keeping quiet, I told him that the best thing I could do for him was to keep quiet for his "personal and professional" reputation. And what did he do? He took that LEAKED (doxed?) conversation and mocked me for it. Then I finally had enough of the slander and personal attacks and decided to set the record straight as to why the show ended.
So what about the other 15 or 16 episodes of slander?
I communicated. He wilfully ignored it
I told a fan I was converting the site to HTML
Megan Pennock told the fans too on Reddit
She asked people to be patient
He ignored it
Then he stole my content and mirrored it without my permission
No, it's my logo, my brand and my artwork that I was never paid for
Did you know that I created the logo, copy and 54 of the thumbnails myself that I was never paid for? Those are mine. Not the show's
Yes, I came up with the name and the concept of the show
The "blank" in the Universe = my brand
I have The Best Page in the Universe, The Best Comic in the Universe, Best Show in the Universe, Biggest Problem in the Universe, Best Debate in the Universe... see a pattern?
Dax didn't contribute as much to the podcast. He didn't have a large fan base, still doesn't, didn't do any work on the podcast. All he did was come in and talk for an hour about his crotch.
No, he STOLE it. I uploaded all of the episodes to Soundcloud for the landing page while I was converting the site. It was always available to the fans
Hilarious or not, it was unfair. I was doing all the work.
Wrong.
Dude I already have a more successful podcast without him.
He couldn't have existed without me
Nobody knew who he was
Do you know how many twitter followers he had before the show started?
Well it's relevant
Because I gave him an audience he could never get on his own
He never thanked me for it
He had 3200
That's it.
He is irrelevant. I don't care about him. He's an awful person who treated me like garbage during the podcast.
He thanked me for political points with the fans.
But look, I should have thanked him
I admit that was wrong.
And yes, Biggest Problem was my show. It's my brand. It's my audience
I exposed the show to an audience of over 300,000
He exposed the show to an audience of 3,200
Whose show is it?
I came up with the concept man
Don't know what else to tell you.
I did all the work, I created the logo, I came up with the name and I came up with the concept. He was my co-host. He added to the show, but don't forget that people hated him when the show first started.
well people got used to him
But you haven't seen the numbers
I lost fans because of him
I tried to
You saw the email I sent
[same email as before at 004_email.jpg]
Are you fucking kidding me? Did you even read it?
Which part do you object to? Where I said "I don't know if the show can be as good without you"? Or the part where I said "I hope you find the happiness and success you're looking for"?
Because he violated my trust dude.
How would you feel if your best friend said that he wasn't your friend and he was just using you?
I can't work with anyone I don't trust
I can't trust him.
Period.
Ever again.
That's absurd
Totally unreasonable.
He was my best fucking friend
And for you to dismiss that hurtful bullshit he said is way over the line
Look dude, I'm done talking about this. This is a waste of my time.
You're telling me I'm wrong to feel betrayed by my best friend using me.
No, I didn't say that
If I was going to, I already would have
If you leak any of this conversation, things will definitely escalate. So if you don't want to ruin more lives, please leave it alone. Pour water instead of gas on this fire.
Here's the thing though: you guys are harassing my sponsors
That needs to stop.
You have no fucking idea about anything that happened with my ex
Did I mention her, ever?
When I say "you guys" I mean the dick warts, not you obviously
Please don't take offense, none intended.
Well the dick warts are awful people who have doxed me and jessica (actual doxing, not just leaked conversations), lied about me, slander me, harass my sponsors and have made rape and death threats. They're the worst people and I don't give a fuck about them.
Keep rationalizing it all you want man, but you know it's only coming from one side: the dick warts. My side is clean. I'm not doxing, harassing or attacking anyone.
Well I have screenshots of doxing on the shitty subreddit too
And we have logs of IRC
Does it fucking matter? Why were they posted in the first place?
I have proof dude.
And no, I'm not sharing it. Again, it's part of a police investigation
So here's what you can do:
If you don't want more lives destroyed, tell everyone to back the fuck off
Dude look, maybe there are some good people in the dick wart community, but all I see is slander about me and Jessica and my podcast. All I see is harassment. I never get positive anything from that whole toxic community. So if those people exist, sorry to lump them in, but your group is defined by the loudest people, and the loudest people harass, dox and threaten us. I don't know what to tell you.
Yeah, you mean the suicide pool? Hilarious!
Let's see how long it takes before we can harass maddox enough to kill himself
Fuck the dick show subreddit.
Fuck everything about them. They're awful people. Period.
I haven't attacked either one of them
Why is he attacking me?
I haven't said shit about Asterios
I don't care about him.
I didn't say that, you're misquoting me.
I said if I tell my side of the story, people will definitely get fired. There's no way to defend myself without talking about the shitty things these people have done. So if everyone backs the fuck off and stops harassing us, this will all go away.
Stop. Harassing. Us.
(not you of course, the dick warts)
well maybe you're right
But Jessica got a rape threat from that group dude. I don't know what to tell you. So did Ela
I'm less concerned about the hurt feelings of a group of redditors than the rape threats that real people are receiving
Did you know Dax told Ela to get AIDS?
And to eat shit and film it?
Then his fans glommed on and did the same thing to her. What choice did she have?
Just put up with the abuse?
Look man, most of the dick warts I've had an experience with are bad people.
They harass us constantly
They dox us
On reddit, on facebook, on IRC and even on Candid
I have dozens of screenshots of dick warts on IRC saying they wanted me to kill myself and to die
They're not good people. I don't care about them.
All they fucking do is harass us
We wouldn't have to use block lists if their fans weren't so fucking toxic
They're toxic because dax and asterios lie about us
I don't care if people make fun of me
I don't care about madcucks
I don't care if you guys call me a bald unfunny arab / jew / faggot / cuck or whatever
Where you cross the line is harassing my sponsors, my family, Jessica and my friends.
Well I wish that site had anything to do with my perspective or my point of view.
Asterios isn't my friend and doesn't have my best interest in mind.
I don't know that madcucks guy
The one person you needed to consult wasn't consulted (me).
The problem is Dax.
It's always been Dax
I've been doing this for 20 years and have never experienced anything like this.
Dax slandered me
Dax talked behind my back
Dax hid financial information from me
Dax attacked my sponsors
Dax attacked my friends
Dax harassed us
Dax is the problem.
Not me.
He's a shitty person. I don't know what to tell you.
I don't talk behind my friend's backs. That's a big difference. Dax isn't my friend anymore. I don't give a fuck about him.
I'm not afraid of Dax or Asterios knowing how I feel. They know.
The main reason I don't want you to leak this conversation is because it will force me to tell my side of the story and it will have repercussiosn and drag this bullshit out longer.
I just want it to stop. Period.
This is only coming from one side: their's. I haven't talked about Asterios or Dax in public. So if the shitty dick warts stop harassing me and leaking private conversations after they promised not to, this will go away. I'm not talking about this with anyone anymore
That's why I said I don't want to talk about this at the start of this conversation and here we are again.
Dude you still don't know the half of what happened about Asterios and Dax. The shit that got leaked is nothing.
There's no defense of what they did. They're bad people. End of story. If I told my side of the story, people's lives would get ruined. They didn't believe me when I said talking about it would have an effect on their "personal and professional" reputation. Don't call my bluff.
No, I have no plan to. If I was going to do that, I already would have. Stop asking me about it and do your best to quell the anger. Dax and Asterios are fanning these flames to make money. I mean for fuck's sake, how are the dick warts so fucking stupid? Haven't you guys figured out you're being lied to?
If Dax was getting more downloads than me, he would have hit iTunes top 200. He hasn't. He isn't. He's a liar.
Wake. Up.
I know
Don't you think I know this?
Well no fucking shit, that's exactly what I said in my email
And Dax didn't care
He hurt my livelihood, Sean's, Randy's and Laurie and Megan's
Dax doesn't care about you or anyone but himself.
If you want this to stop, do your best to stop him
He's been the problem all along
I"m not talking about him or Asterios or any of this bullshit
I'm busy dude
I don't have time for this.
There won't be an H-bomb if they don't escalate.
I don't care
I made my career without him
He's a dipshit who had a few funny stories when he got drunk
He used to be my friend and he betrayed my trust
Twice.
I can't trust him
And neither can you.
You don't even fucking know him.
I'm telling you, as someone who knows him intimately, be scared.
No, because it'll be more fuel for the podcast
That's all they care about
"maddox is threatening us with our livelihoods!" I'm not.
I haven't made any threats.
And I don't intend to.
Here's how you can help:
1. When Dax suggests blatant lies and suggests going after my sponsors, voice your opinion and say it's wrong and suggest that if the tables were turned, he wouldn't appreciate people going after his livelihood. I haven't gone after his. UCB is a slap on the wrist and had nothing to do with my video (he knows this and he's wilfully misrepresenting this to the public for patreon bucks).
Nobody has gone after his job
Wow, he's awful.
It's trivial to show that the dick warts are harassing us. I guess he can verify it from the police reports.
Dax attacked us for 16 episodes before the video was released
Compare our subreddits
Compare my Twitter
Compare my Facebook
Compare my podcast to his
CONSTANT HARASSMENT from him
BEFORE the video was released.
He's full of shit dude.
C'mon man
You know this is one-sided
I'm not attacking him. Or Asterios. Or his family. Or anyone. We just want them to leave us the fuck alone
Stop. Talking. About. Us. Stop. Harassing. Us. That's it
That's when this will all go away.
No more "Dick on Maddox" episodes
No more "hot goss"
No more slander
No more attacks
Period.
This will all stop when he stops.
I'm not talking about him
I'm not calling the shots behind the scenes. Jesse is his own person. I haven't asked him to do anything.
There is no hidden Madcast group
Join my IRC, there's no chat about this stuff
I'm not talking about it. PERIOD.
This is all his doing.
I only made one post about Dax after months of slander. I have a right to defend myself. You're complaining about one 3.5 minute video instead of 33 episodes of slander?
Dax never wanted anything to do with the Facebook group. I created it and I moderated it. The site didn't go down, I put up a landing page and it was live with all of the episodes archived on soundcloud for all the fans to listen to. He lied to the fans and told them I deleted it even though dozens of people quoted me on Reddit saying I was converting the site to static HTML
I explained why in public on Twitter and the dick warts posted this on Reddit and made fun of it: https://twitter.com/maddoxrules/status/743744255240212480
https://www.reddit.com/r/biggestproblem/comments/4vul57/bpitu_site_conversion_to_static_html/
There you go
Proof.
Jesus dude
I posted it on Facebook too
Where else do you want me to post it? How else can you find a way to find fault in something good I did?
I paid for it out of pocket and I spent hours converting it
Sorry I wasn't clear enough for you?
What do you want me to say?
People were talking about it and knew about it
Dick lied
He always lies
He's a liar.
I did post it on Facebook
and Twitter
I deleted those tweets thoguh
*though
I did. You guys ignored it
There were plenty of people in the know
He knew about it
Randy knew about it
Sean knew about it
Please can you just admit something I did positive for once?
Jesus man. I can't win with you
Even when I spend HOURS converting the site, uploading all of the episodes to soundcloud, paying for it myself and notifying the fans, you find some way to fault me. I can never win.
I'm always wrong. Got it.
Well I'm pretty fucking tired of being abused by these dipshits
Here's what I owe you guys: NOTHING.
I don't owe you shit. I don't owe you a podcast. I don't owe you entertainment. I don't owe Dax a fan base. I don't owe anyone an explanation into my personal life with my ex girlfriend or any of this shit. It's time everyone fucked off and left me alone.
You owe me your gratitude for all the years of free content
at my expense.
If you don't like it, don't listen. I don't care.
How about a fucking thank you?
Dax got into UCB because of me. Dax has a podcast now because of me. Dax has a girlfriend now because of me. Dax has a house now because of me. How much more can he fucking use me for? FUCK HIM and fuck the fans who took me for granted. I'm done dude.
I don't owe you guys shit.
Cool, how many hours did you spend contributing content? Drop in the bucket to the 12 x 129 hours I spent on it (and that's just production, not counting meetings). That's over 1,548 hours. And paying for a few bonus episodes doesn't offset the cost of producing the other 107 free ones.
So how about a thank you?
Instead of constant harassment
Seriously I'm done with this whole thing man. I'm over it
All I wanted to do in life is produce the best content for people to enjoy
And this is the thanks I get?
Fucking enough
I've fucking had it.
You're offended?! Sorry, is there a forum of people who are harassing and slandering you and calling you a cuck and a faggot every fucking day? Please go on and tell me how you're offended. I'm over this dude.
You have two options as a fan:
1. Listen to the show
2. Don't listen to the show
That's it.
Harassing and medling in people's personal lives is way over the line. And that's what the dick warts are doing. I just want to be left alone.
I'm not going to escalate this. Please, I just want to be left alone.
I'm sorry buddy, I don't mean to hurt you
I understand some of what I said was hurtful. I'm just frustrated with this whole thing.
I'd like to know how you were hurt if you're willing to tell me.
No man, I appreciate you talking with me
I appreciate hearing your point of view
And I appreciate you arguing with me because it helps show where there might be holes in my arguments
And you have helped me verbalize what I did wrong: not thank Dax.
You're a good guy
who's trying to do the right thing
And I believe at your heart, the reason is because you don't like to see people suffering
Neither do I
As much as I don't like Dax, I don't "wish him the worst."
That's the difference between us. I just want to be left alone. He wants to destroy us.
He's not a kind or good person. Just look at the way he attacks us daily. That's not what kind people do or say.
I ended my email to him with "I hope you find the happiness and success you're looking for." And I meant it. He ends his email with "I wish them the worst." Goes to show you his true colors.
I think your efforts have made a difference. Even if you don't realize it yet
Just the fact that you voiced your opinion to both of us means a lot
It shows that there are still good people who care and want this to stop
Fair enough. I hear you man
I see how that was hurtful. You don't owe me anything either, and I appreciate the amount of time and effort you've put into this
I do what I do because I love it, and I like the people who appreciate me for it. Not the people who feel entitled to it. I'm sorry if I lumped you into that category. I speak candidly with you, and when I say "you guys" or talk about the dick warts as a whole, please know I'm excluding you from that group. I don't talk with just anyone like this. I've met you in person and I know you're a good dude.
Thanks buddy, that's all I've wanted all along
Jessica and I just want to be left alone
I'm not talking with fans anymore. The only reason I ever did was to defend myself against Dax's lies
It's not fair that we're treated this way over a fucking comedy podcast
Nobody's ego is worth this much suffering. I was wrong not to thank him, but we don't deserve all of this
And to answer your question that started this all: no, I'm not using the nuclear option. I have no interest in escalating this. This will all go away as soon as they stop talking about us (not counting madcucks, I don't care about him or the fans making fun of me... as long as it's not crossing the line of harassment, personal attacks and harassing sponsors).
I really appreciate it man
If you ever come out to LA, I'd like to grab a drink with you
dunno if you drink. heh
In any event, I'd really like to stop talking about this. Please don't take it personally. But I'm taking your advice to stop talking to people about this
You're the last one I'm still talking to
If you want to communicate a position from me, it's this: the sooner they stop talking, the sooner this all goes away. I'm keeping my side clean. I haven't said anything about them. There won't be any private conversations in response to their public accusations when this stops. I don't want it to escalate.
Or don't, I dunno man. Maybe it's better not to at this point. But thanks for listening :)
I don't drink to get drunk either
Hey one last thing: I don't have any control over Jesse and I'm not calling the shots (for real). The warts attacked him unfairly for a show that wasn't even on my network. They took away his livelihood, which is way over the line. That's might become a huge problem for Dax if he doesn't resolve that. Jesse has already expressed his terms: he needs Dax to admit publicly that he went over the line and to back off. Basically the same thing we all want: just for him to stop and to leave us alone. But anyway, I'm not calling the shots and I have nothing to do with that. I'm too busy producing kickass content
Speaking of, I released 3 videos in the last 2 weeks with combined views of over 160,000!
That's what I want to do: produce kickass content that people enjoy
All this other shit is a distraction :)
Thanks for the follow man!
I hear you
But don't believe everything you see man... Jesse is a performer. He often talks with people behind the scenes before he does anything. I don't want to give away too much, but you're seeing a performance. I won't defend everything he says or does though, he's definitely done some questionable things. The n-word comes to mind, but he admitted his mistake and apologized for it.
I'm a big fan of h3h3
yeah Ethan is great, we text sometimes
I feel like I just name-dropped a YouTube celebrity hahah
As for doxing though, what Dax and Asterios did by disclosing my private finances is illegal and actual doxing.
Though I don't agree with naming family members on the air who aren't public. But again, this is after Dax already named private individuals (friends of mine and Jessica) on the air. So I understand his reasoning.
Anyway man, this is neither here nor there. I just hope this dies down so we can all just move on and have fun. I just want to make good content
You're a good dude, thanks again for helping man. Believe it or not, it does make a difference
Even if it's not always apparent :)
Didn't get a chance to check it out if you did, still have it?
I haven't talked to Jesse about you. Have you leaked our conversations?
It looks like you're fanning the flames man, why would you attack me like that? Would you think it was funny if someone was hurting your livelihood and I mocked you in public for it? That's not cool.
It's not my side man, I don't control anyone. I haven't talked with Jesse about any of this. I don't tell Jesse, Jessica, Rucka or anyone I work with what to do. And that includes Asterios. If Jesse brings you up, of course I'll ask him not to fuck with you, but please don't fan the flames. Why would you mock me for the sponsors like that? That's not cool man
This is 100% coming from Dax. He's encouraging people to send screenshots for more "hot goss." He wants to continue this. I have still not said a single tweet or mention of him on my podcast
The dick warts took away Jesse's livelihood, I can't imagine that he's just going to sit back and take it
The more the push, the more this will keep going. I'm not fanning these flames.
Dude, "Madcucks" attacks and mocks me and Jesse responds to it... do you see how this started? Why is there a person obsessed with mocking me? How do you not see that Dax started this whole thing?
Why can't they just leave me alone?
No more "hot goss," no more leaked conversations, no more madcucks. Dax started attacking me from the get-go. I still haven't attacked him. I haven't said a single fucking thing about him except for that video, which only came as a response to 4 months of him lying about me.
That's true
He's allowed to make fun of me
and people are allowed to make fun of him
He's pretending to be me and made a Patreon for it, so Jesse thought it would be funny to make a patreon pretending to be someone pretending to be me. That's not why Jesse's patreon got shut down though. It was because of the n-word bullshit that was behind his pay wall and that he apologized for.
Well if someone posts your personal information, you should definitely report it
I don't think it's cool to dox people, which is why I haven't done it
But you're hanging out with the guy who constantly "doxes" me: Dax. He encourages his users to "dox" me (according to your defintion)
So it's bound to come your way too man. You're in the snake pit, you're going to get bit eventually. They're messing with fire
Thank you
No, it's not just "making fun of" me
It's slander
He's releasing private financial information. That's doxing
He's encouraging his fans to harass amazon
That's harassment
He's calling my girlfriend a bitch on the air. That's harassment
He's attacking my livelihood
That's harassment and abuse
He's a bad person dude. This is only coming from him.
I'm not doing any of it.
Yeah, again, I thanked you for it, but you consulted only dick warts and Asterios for it
it had zero input from me or my fans. Madcucks and Asterios don't speak for me.
Thanks
I think you left before, but the warts were in full-on harassment mode by the end of the stream
Thanks
that's pretty cool that you use vim
I use it for everything
they were coordinating raids from the facebook group...
My mods were doing as much as they could. It sucks...
wtf
ugh, man I don't know/care about any of that stuff heh
but there's still brigading going on from the warts to r/madcast
that's why Jesse and I don't promote it
caught one of the reddit guys harassing too: https://www.twitch.tv/688as
why bother us? He's not a fan, he's there to intimidate, harass and insult. These aren't good people who are there to support. They're there to antagonize. The messages were deleted because he was banned
This is a persistent problem
He's also the one who "doxed" me when I tried reaching out to him on reddit.
he took screenshots of everything and posted it against my wishes.
He also said he wanted me to die
He said he hopes I kill myself. Real salt of the earth guy.
Please don't share my conversations with you with him.
He's a liar
I have eyes and ears everywhere
He said he hopes I kill myself
But then again, this is from the TDS reddit that has a suicide pool. ��
These are bad people
Saying it's "banter" is dismissive. It's a way to shirk responsibility and minimize the horrible things that are being said and done.
Harassment = trolling. Suicide = banter. Rape threats = jokes. Rape list = one guy. When will it be enough for it to be a problem? When someone gets killed?
Good
They're not jokes. My friend was put on that rape list.
Well this isn't one instance. This is a pattern: violent threats against Asterios' ex-wife, rape list, death threats, suicide pool, harassment, stalking, messaging sponsors, Dustin's family getting death threats, etc, etc, etc.
People on TDS subreddit linked to Jessica's twitter calling her a "filthy whore"
Dax telling Ela to get AIDS and eat shit and film it
Dax encouraging people to "dox" me by re-tweeting private conversations and offering a bounty for them
Buddy
He doesn't care about you
He doesn't care about me
I was his friend of 10 years. Look at the way he treated me
See how badly he treats me now?
That's a glimpse of how awful he was even before the podcast ended.
How do you not think what he's doing is wrong? He's attacking my livelihood. He attacked it even before I released that video. He slandered me for months. He lied and cheated. He continues to lie about me. He lies to the fans about the numbers he's getting (downloads at least), his fans manipulate the download ranks. I mean, this isn't one or two bad eggs, this is a community of people who stalk, harass, abuse and make threats. This is toxic. I don't know what it'll take for people to see that.
Before that video was released, I did *nothing* wrong to Dax other than not mention him in the final episode. That's it.
Everything else he has told about me is a lie.
I haven't changed.
That's Dax's bullshit narrative to turn people against me
Well there seems to be a huge double standard because when Jesse makes an off-color joke and says the "n-word" followed by "just kidding, I'm sure Denzel is a good guy." The dick warts jump all over it not because they're offended, but because they're mean-spirited people who want to hurt people's livelihoods. They hurt mine, even though that show had nothing to do with my network.
How is that fair?
No
Dax hit first
Go listen to episode 12
Seriously, listen to it
He slanders me for 20 minutes
You want to talk about character assassination? He literally says that I "have no character." That's character assassination.
No, Dax hit Jesse first
And the dick warts are constantly harassing us
Seriously, join the madcast subreddit and see how much shit we have to put up with on a daily basis
The dick warts keep harassing us and Jesse fought back.
I'm not saying everything he's doing is right or that I agree with it, but he's responding to harassment from the dick warts.
Go listen to episode 12
around the 20 minute mark
He lies about me constantly in that episode
slanders me
says to his "life coach" that I never replied to him a single time since the show ended. That's a bald-faced lie.
He's obsessed
No!
I don't even know where the fuck this bullshit is coming from
Seriously this is insane.
He's lost his fucking mind.
Asterios is full of shit.
Asterios, Larry and I have never been in the same room together
I've never said ANYTHING to Asterios about Larry
I didn't even know Asterios knew who Larry was
And want to know the truth about Asterios and my friendship? We've only hung out together solo maybe about 3-4 times
We weren't that close. He doesn't really know me.
woah, maybe... is he getting that from Dax?
Part of that is true
Larry was going to have a show on my network
I could see Dax saying that to Larry tongue-in-cheek, but that didn't come from me. I never told Asterios anything about Larry. Asterios is a liar.
Asterios is a liar.
Asterios said he got doxed.
He didn't.
Hey that reminds me
If you think what Jess did to Asterios was doxing, do you think quoting someone is also doxing?
Do you think it's doxxing or quoting?
Because you just paraphrased me to 688as, did you just dox me? Or did you quote me?
well so what's the difference?
You took a private conversation
Without my permission
And shared it with people
So why's that quoting whereas what Jess did is doxing?
See what I'm getting at?
Yes, I already admit it was shitty
Let's not go there again, I've acknowledged that it was shitty and wrong of her to do
But it's not doxing.
You realize doxing is illegal right?
No, doxing = illegal.
He martyred himself to make himself a victim go get money
Dax and Asterios are lying to make more money.
Follow the money.
Dude, why isn't this obvious to the dick warts?
They're fleecing you guys with bullshit stories about how they were victimized
I haven't done anything wrong to Dax other than not mention him
I haven't done anything wrong to Asterios
I have zero things to apologize for Asterios.
hahahaha
he's out of his fucking mind. Apologize for what?
If he truly wanted an apology, he'd talk to me
He knows how to get a hold of me
Want to know the truth about Asterios? He's not such a nice guy
He threatened me with my book release
I told him I could threaten his livelihood too
He said "do it!"
I wouldn't
Because it doesn't make me feel good to go so low
But he threatened me
He's a scumbag.
He's assuming I know who it was
Asterios is a mean son of a bitch, why would I share that information with him, even if I knew? So Asterios can attack and smear them in public like he's doing to me? Fuck him.
I'm not interested in protecting his reputation. He's two-faced. He talks behind his friend's backs.
I told you I don't know
But it could very well be one of my friends
and even if I knew, there's no way I'd tell Asterios, that mean-spirited asshole
Want to know something else about Asterios? Right before I released that video, I told him I was fed up with this bullshit and I was going to release a statement telling everything, and he said "do it!" He encouraged me to release that video. He even knew about Dax's rape statement. He said I should release it. So there you go.
hey man, can you please not share any part of these conversations with anyone ever again, unless I explicitly give you permission? I haven't shared anything you've told me with anyone, I think it's fair that I expect the same level of privacy from you
that's fine, if it was general like you're saying
And it wasn't a dumb idea
You were on the right track. It just has to be neutral and representative
hmm
interesting you say that
You know, I talked with a friend once who told me something interesting: my friend said, "if you find yourself dating and meeting the same types of people, you have to ask yourself, what is it about you that attracts these people to you?"
I'm sorry to hear that, must be a terrible burden for you'
Do you wish people would be less sharing with you?
Well look man, I'm not saying I'm "right" or wrong. I'm just explaining myself. I know I've done things to upset Dax. We had creative differences on the show, and those aren't "right" or "wrong." Those are differences of perspective. He has his philosophy and I have mine. I don't begrudge him for disagreeing with me as long as it's coming from a pure place. Where he did "wrong" and he crossed the line is by being unethical and misleading me into thinking we were still friends only so he could use me for money and to ride my coattails for publicity. And when he slandered me, and attacked my friends and my girlfriend and livelihood. That's unethical. That's wrong. That's not a matter of opinion or disagreement. That's just a shitty thing to do to someone, especially after I've done so much for him.
He wouldn't have his podcast without me. He wouldn't have been admitted into UCB without me. He wouldn't have met Randy without me. He wouldn't even have a girlfriend without me. He used me for everything he could and gave me nothing but hatred in return. Do you know how shitty that feels?
I want you to take a moment to think about what I just said
He wouldn't even have his fucking house
He's used me for everything he can and he's still trying to use me.
I'm sorry to hear that, that's pretty rough
For what it's worth, I used to think that people mostly had good intentions in life. That's that phenomenon you noticed where people think they're trying to do good and just try to justify their philosophies
But honestly, dealing with Dax changed me
I no longer believe most people have good intentions. He definitely doesn't
Even Asterios, I don't like the guy, but I think he's messed up and doesn't know what he's doing. He's not truly evil, he's just selfish and fucked up. Dax on the other hand? Watch out. He's a bad egg
(go on, I'm listening)
Look man, I know him. I know him better than anyone. Asterios doesn't know him, even my ex (who he's dating) doesn't know him. I've known the guy for a decade. He's a bad person.
Look at how much suffering he's trying to cause us
And for what? A fucking comedy podcast?
ah
Don't lose hope man
There's lots to hope for
I think you struggle because you have hope, deep down somewhere
Want to know something?
I'm kind of like you... people confide in me a lot
Lots of people share their suffering with me
I've spoken to so many suicidal fans of mine
and have talked many off the ledge, and have become lifelong friends with some of them
Wanna see something? Please don't share this:
[omitted link; not comfortable reading people linking to the text page full of suicidal people thanking Maddox for his content]
Ohh, did I share it before?
Thanks
the one about self-defeating thoughts?
episode 67?
episode 77
that was a good episode
Those were two of my favorites as well
67 resonated with a lot of people
It was the most memorable episode for so many people
I wanted to do more episodes like that
Have you ever spoken with a therapist? Not to suggest you need to, but it could definitely help you get some more clarity
That disassociation you're feeling might be a sign that you're overwhelmed
How do you think your head is off kilter?
Fucking a
Do you live at home?
Well look man
you can change things starting with you
I'm glad you're making positive steps
Some of it sounds bleak for sure
Wanna hear a parable that helps me get through tough times sometimes?
It's an explanation for why bad things happen to good people...
There was a student in biology who loved to collect butterflies. One day he found a cocoon and excitedly took it to his teacher, who said he should watch and nurse it patiently until it hatched. Finally the day came for it to hatch, and the boy patiently watched the larvae struggling to get out of its cocoon, and then he decided to help it along by cutting the cocoon open a bit. The larvae came out and died shortly after. He was distraught over the butterfly's death, so he took it to school and asked his teacher what happened. The teacher told him that because he helped the butterfly out of its cocoon, it didn't build the adequate strength to survive in the world (that's actually what happens if butterflies don't hatch on their own... they die if you help them).
Similarly, sometimes bad things happen to us and cause us to struggle so we can grow and strengthen to endure the tougher challenges that come in life. We need to go through this struggle to survive what else life has in store for us.
anyway man, hope you like that story. I've gotta crash
hang in there, it was good talking with you
sure thing
nope
why?
'sup
Good to hear! What new?
hah, cool man. You went on a Mars tour?
What prompted the comment about not being in the right mindset last time we spoke?
That's cool of you to be so self-ware
*self-aware
And congrats on the new job. Whatcha doing at Mars?
Hope so too man, good luck! Sounds awesome.
I don't want any of our conversation reported back to anyone
Can you guarantee that you aren't communicating directly or indirectly anything I tell you?
Do I have your word?
Well because I was surprised to learn that you'd been communicating some of what we talked about with some of the dick warts in irc (when you relayed a conversation you'd had with 688as or whatever)
Yes, this goes for all of our conversations
I assumed you knew that, so now I'm communicating that extra clearly just to make sure
So there's no misunderstanding
That's all
But as long as I have your word, I can tell you
Because I don't want to fuel more "hot goss" or bullshit for the dick warts. It's pathetic. It needs to stop. I can speak for myself if I wanted to. I don't want to make any public comments about anything.
I'm not guilty of anything. I have a totally clear conscience and am happy and content. I'm not a depressed alcoholic who spends every waking minute of his life trying to destroy someone's life and career like a certain obsessed sociopath.
My life is not their content. This is like the world's saddest TMZ
Not to be rude, but serious question: aren't you embarrassed to be associated with it?
I mean it's literally "gossip" about a man's personal life. They've tried to pick apart my finances, my love life, my mental health, my family, my friends... it's time everyone fucked off.
Well it is embarrassing. It's what old women do.
How would you feel if someone was doing that to you?
Maybe it should.
I'm a person.
What does this have to do with Dax?
He's the one doing all the harassing.
I'm not bothering him.
He's constantly bothering me.
No. He has affected his personal image.
Sorry, I warned him about it 3 times
He didn't take my warning seriously
Nope
I warned him to never say that to me again.
I told him in person
I told him on the podcast
And I told the person who emailed me that if I talked about it, it would hurt his personal and professional reputation.
And it did.
I put up with 4 months of abuse and slander from him
So I finally had enough.
And you don't know why he got banned from UCB
It had nothing to do with my video actually
He's not telling you guys the truth because he might go to jail if he does.
So maybe you need to stop defending someone you don't know
Who has said and done some very hurtful things to women.
Want this to go further?
Want me to tell everyone what he did? Because that's what's coming next.
Fuck him. He's a piece of shit, far worse than you know.
I don't think I can get through to you. You don't empathize with the abuse I've been dealing with.
You honestly don't think there's anything wrong with telling a woman that she should EXPECT/PREPARE to get raped?
You think it's funny to tell a woman that if she gets fucked while she's passed out that it's not rape?
Yes. Nobody should ever "prepare" to get raped/robbed/kidnapped. You can take precautions, but if you prepare, that means you EXPECT IT. If you expect it, that means it's YOUR FAULT.
It's fucking victim-blaming dude. How do you call yourself a feminist and not see this? I can't stand modern feminism and SJW shit, but even I know this.
Do you think it's rape to fuck a girl who's passed out in your bed?
Do you think it's funny to joke about?
Do you find this funny: "A guy who fucks a drunk girl who passed out in his bed isn’t a rapist, he’s just a dick. Get over it"?
Good.
So why do you support a man who denies that's rape?
Because he told me the same shit in person
What difference does it make?
What could I tell you to make you finally realize he's a scumbag?
I feel like you're asking so you can justify your support of him because you're feeling cognitive dissonance. You're a good guy who doesn't want to admit he's supporting a terrible person.
Well you've been listening to him talk shit about me for 8 months
Are you kidding me?
I put up with 4 months of abuse and I WARNED HIM not to say that and he kept badgering me. Fuck that. I have every right to defend myself
That clip is what he truly believes
He told me the same thing in person
And he said it was the rape victim's fault
He truly believes that if a girl drinks too much, that it's her fault if she gets raped.
Do you find those beliefs deplorable?
What if I proved to you that he does?
He's paying Sean a lot of money to be on the show
Sean was doing my show for next to nothing compared to what he was making on Dax's show.
Literally everyone on the show or in his life has some financial involvement with him
Asterios is making money
Sean is making money
News babe is making money
Follow the $$$
But back to the question...
Answer me honestly: if I proved to you that he believes that a girl who gets raped if she's drunk, it's her fault, would you stop supporting him and admit he's a fucking disgusting piece of shit?
Okay
Promise me. No more excuses. No more defense of him or his bullshit.
I don't want you creating a website saying that Dax needs to clean up his act or laugh from afar or anything. I don't want you to mention this to him. This is just for you.
You know I have the proof. Think about it. I'm putting you on the spot here. If I have your assurance you'll stop supporting him, then I'll show you. If you'd rather not know so you can be willfully ignorant of the bad people you support, then go support him and enjoy his "content" as he picks apart my life.
So you think I'm just wasting your time here?
This is a big put-on so I can get you to promise and then I don't show you anything? C'mon man.
Look. You've made your choice.
The answer is clear.
Go support him. Have fun with the dick warts. I want no part of it.
When he gets arrested one day for rape or assault or fraud or God knows what terrible thing he'll finally get caught doing, don't say I didn't warn you.
You don't want to know because it will prove you've been supporting a terrible person. I get it. Go do your thing man.
It does affect you.
You're creating music for him. Your name is attached to his.
You're supporting someone who thinks it's a woman's fault if she gets raped when she's drunk. Remember that.
Except you can't.
I just told you.
Now you can't claim ignorance.
Maybe the public won't know
But you and I will know.
I told you. You can keep denying it all you want. I offered you proof if you would stop supporting him but you're unwilling to see it because you're afraid if I'm right, you might have to.
You're comfortable with the Trump-supporting dick warts, so go have fun there man. I want no part of it.
No. I asked you clearly what it would take for you to stop supporting him. You said if I showed you evidence that he said that it's a girl's fault if she gets raped when she's drunk, that you'd stop supporting him. I have that evidence and now you're afraid to see it because you know that if I show it to you, you'll have to change a part of your life that you like. You enjoy hanging out with those losers, and you enjoy his show for whatever reason, and you don't want to have to change that part of your life. I get it.
But don't say I didn't warn you.
You make a promise BASED ON YOUR PRINCIPLES.
I'm not asking you to make a promise based on evidence you haven't seen, but what YOU BELIEVE.
Do you believe it's a girl's fault if she gets raped when she's drunk?
Do you believe that's a disgusting thing to say?
And if he said that, would you stop supporting him?
Okay
"all date rape victims are lying whores."
That's a disgusting thing to say, right?
Well then, here you go. Read it for yourself: http://www.menarebetterthanwomen.com/date-rape-is-a-myth/
Because he said it to me in person, off the air, when nobody was listening but me and him. He wasn't joking in person, and he wasn't joking on the podcast. That's what he truly believes. And the reason people have disassociated with him is because they know this is true. There is nobody left in his life who isn't tied to him financially.
I'm not saying you can never joke about rape
But that doesn't sound like a joke. It's not funny.
He has said that in multiple articles, he told it to me in person, and he said it on the podcast. And if you read the comments on those articles, they're all guys who truly believe that it's a woman's fault if she gets raped when she's drunk. They got the message. There's a clear pattern of this type of behavior and these beliefs that he has. Sorry man. I know it sucks to know that you've been supporting a scumbag this whole time, but he truly is. I want nothing to do with him, and no amount of success or money is worth compromising my principles for it.
But I'm just a guy who hasn't put ads on his site for 20 years based on a promise I made, what do I know about integrity?
I never said I wouldn't advertise on my podcast and videos. Only my website.
What does that have to do with anything?
We're talking about you
And your principles. Now you know who you're supporting.
You can't claim ignorance one day when he gets caught.
Yes, on my website.
I made a promise 20 years ago and kept that promise
Even though I could be making upwards of $12k per month.
That's because I have integrity.
I have no idea what this has anything to do with Candid. They aren't a sponsor on my show anymore anyway.
Oh, I could if I wanted to, but I like Candid.
I would never advertise for a sponsor's product if I didn't like the product. I've been approached by pet food companies but turned them down because I don't have pets. Same with eye glass companies because I don't wear glasses.
As for the guy's girlfriend, yes I added her. No, I didn't flirt with her. It's part of a project I'm working on that I'll reveal at the end of the year. Yes, Jessica knows (feel free to ask her yourself).
You'll know at the end of the year. It's for a project.
hahaha
You mean the dick warts? Same people who call me a bald faggot cuck liar cheat scumbag loser failure? Those guys now think I'm a creep? OH NO!
NOT THAT!!!@#$@
I couldn't care less about the dick warts.
Dude I don't want you linking to that or discussing it with them, like I said this is just for you
Don't look to other people to make up excuses for why you're somehow okay with this.
No, not everyone knows about it. I didn't even know he'd written that stuff until recently. I would have cut ties a long time ago.
Cool, is it also a troll to tell Ela Darling to get AIDS?
Is it also a troll to attack my girlfriend personally?
Real funny troll, guy.
He told me it wasn't satire.
You don't know him.
Why are you defending someone you don't know?
Why give him the benefit of doubt after he's attacked so many real women online?
No she fucking didn't.
She didn't say that.
In fact, nobody did.
You guys started calling him a rape apologist. Not me.
I simply played a clip of what he truly believes.
To defend myself against his accusations
He said I just "cut things I don't like" to a fan, so I was demonstrating the type of shit I cut from episodes.
He said in black and white on his website that a guy who fucks a drunk chick isn't a rapist. He said in black and white that date rape isn't a myth. Do you think that's funny? Is that a troll? Because the guys in the comments don't think so. Read the comments. This is who you're supporting man.
I know the cognitive dissonance you're feeling right now sucks, but stop looking for excuses to justify his shitty behavior.
You think this is some kind of vendetta I have against him? I've had that clip for a long time. If I wanted to simply attack Dax for being a piece of shit, why do you think I waited 4 months to release that clip?
Dude
No
I'm saying AFTER it ended
And by the way, biggest problem was failing near the end.
I waited 4 months AFTER the podcast ended to release that clip. Why do you think that is?
It wasn't the "Seinfeld of podcasts." Our numbers were low and the podcast was failing. That's the sad truth.
So you think I did that to "win" some imaginary fight I wasn't taking part of?
Even though I stayed silent and could have released that right when the podcast ended? Even though I didn't mention him at all for 4 months after it ended? Even though I didn't tweet at him or slander him at all? That's what you truly believe?
NO.
Prove it. What "seeds" did I plant?
After months of slander I finally had enough.
Someone asked me why I wasn't talking and I told the truth: because I wanted to remain professional. When he started attacking my sponsors and my livelihood and my girlfriend, I had enough and I released that video.
What the fuck are you talking about? I only sent one email to a fan, that's my sin? I didn't even say anything bad about him.
Jesus.
I said that if I told my side of the story it would hurt his personal and professional reputation. That's my sin?
How is that at all comparable to him attacking my sponsors for month, calling me a cuck endlessly, lying about finances, calling my girlfriend a bitch on air, lying about my finances, etc, etc, etc?
Dude I'm tired of this. I'm done talking about it. Later.
I don't care what a bunch of rapey Trump supporters think about me. These are people who have a suicide pool going about my life. They're awful people. Good riddance.
You told me
Thanks man
haha yeah
haha thanks
I've told you 3 times now. I don't want to fuel any more drama. My life and private conversations aren't for some slanderous asshole to make into content. That's the whole point of direct messaging.
Why does it matter to you so much? Why are you so concerned that I want something totally reasonable--my privacy?
Dude. Stop.
What do you want to verify?
JESUS DUDE
You did EXACTLY what I asked you not to.
He's a fucking liar. Look at the second paragraph: if MABTW was this "secret" then why would you go on Dr. Phil, a national show broadcast to millions? He's a fucking liar. It's not comedy. Wake up.
He told me in person it wasn't satire.
What was the email you sent to him?
Can you show me your email?
Read that second paragraph again. He's lying to you in that second paragraph. You don't make a "funny secret" and then go on national television. Sorry. BULLSHIT. Can you admit he's lying directly to you?
I can't fucking believe you emailed him after we talked dude.
I'm not, YOU AGREED TO IT.
This is what YOU AGREED TO. I'm talking with you under the condition that you don't tell others what we talk about. If you're going to tell other people, then we don't have to talk. End of story.
This man is trying to destroy my livelihood and my life, he is obsessed with me and now you're feeding him things I tell you? Are you fucking kidding me?
That's all you sent him?
Dude, you're trying desperately to justify supporting him. Even the way you phrased that question: "The site is just a giant troll site, right?" -- YOU'RE SUGGESTING THAT TO HIM. You're leading him to the conclusion you HOPE is true with that question. Did you know if you do that in a jury, the judge will dismiss your case? That's leading the witness and it's confirmation bias. C'mon man, you're smarter than this.
http://dictionary.law.com/Default.aspx?selected=1121
Not if you promised me and gave me your word that you wouldn't talk to anyone about what we talked about.
I can't control you, clearly. But you promised me.
No.
You agreed not to talk about what we talked about with anyone.
Because if I tell you something that only I know, then he'll infer that we've been talking. As he probably is now. I'm really disappointed buddy
I care.
You don't realize what you're doing by telling him things we talk about, even if you don't say that I said it.
You don't know him.
This is a pattern I'm seeing where I'll tell you the truth or some uncomfortable fact about him, and you'll then go on a fact-finding mission to justify, rationalize or explain-away all the feelings of discomfort you have because you've been lied to and manipulated. That's clear confirmation bias:
[he sent me the google definition for confirmation bias: http://www.wauterboi.com/016-email3.jpg]
Can you admit he lied to you in that second paragraph?
oh man... buddy, you should really research who you follow.
That was taped in 2005 and aired in 2006.
So... can you admit he lied to you?
That's irrelevant
The point is: he said in that second paragraph that the Internet was a ghost town in 2005. It wasn't. He said that MABTW was supposed to be a little secret comedy site. It wasn't. He went on national television to promote it.
So he lied to you... can you admit that?
Whew, thank you :)
I mean, if you step back and look at the things he's saying... you'll realize how much he's been lying to you and other people.
He's desperate to control the narrative about what happened. I've stayed quiet because I know they're lies and there's nothing to respond to. If I replied to every unsubstantiated claim he made, it's all I'd have time to do.
So if he's willing to lie directly to you in a private email, what else do you think he's lied about?
It's not buddy. It's a lie...
He's telling you that MABTW was a secret the same year he went on Dr. Phil?
That's a lie.
hahaha
hahah
Alright buddy, I'm glad you can see this now...
if he's willing to lie directly to you in a private email, what else do you think he's lied about?
Well, yeah, he's a good story teller and decent at improvising... but those are also skills you can use to manipulate people and lie.
If you listen to a maniac rant about someone for 8 months, it has to have an effect on you after a while. Even if you try to dismiss it.
Another word for a story is a yarn, and another word for a yarn is a lie.
What else do you think he's lied about?
Well that's pretty interesting
Because if you believe Dax, then I sound like a pretty horrible person. Even if you believe 50% of what he said is true about me. He makes me sound like a truly awful person.
Yet I've consistently told you he's a liar
We can't both be telling the truth
So if you're talking with me, that means you're choosing to keep company with someone who's a huge jerk and a bad person... but I don't think you believe that.
This isn't one of those cases where there's a he-said-he-said / gray area going on. He's a bald-faced liar.
I mean he's willing to lie directly to you in a private email right? What else do you think he's lied about? There's a big one that I'm surprised and disappointed more people haven't called him out on
The reason he told people for the podcast ending
I don't listen to him or his bullshit slanderous podcast, but I hear bits and pieces, and he's made it sound like sleeping with my ex (80s girl) was the reason it ended. He said that event occurred around episode 77, after we attended a wedding, right?
haha no
Episode 77
The reason he wasn't on that episode was because he offered not to "come in for a while." The exact quote was "if you need to kick me off the show for a while, I understand." I took him up on his offer. Did he mention that on the show? Doubt it.
yep
Yes
He offered not to come in and I took him up on his offer.
He said that's the reason the podcast ended, the events that occurred at that wedding, right?
That last part isn't true.
I did set up a meeting to talk about the show at a bar with Randy though. Wanna know what was on my list of problems I had with him?
haha no
His beliefs about rape. I brought it up to him in that meeting. I called the meeting because the show was failing and our numbers were really low.
I told him and Randy that those comments he made to me in person and on the podcast were disgusting and I never wanted to be associated with it.
The snack thing is simple: he would complain about the snacks I brought in every week, without ever contributing, like I owed him something. I was buying the snacks for Sean because he worked 8+ hour days and then did the podcast immediately after work so he wouldn't have time to eat and would get hungry. Dax made it all about himself and acted like I owed him something.
But anyway, back to that meeting... yes it did happen. And that's when I mentioned the rape comments to him in front of Randy, so Randy's a witness.
But anyway, the podcast allegedly ended because of what happened at the wedding, right?
Yep, but again, PLEASE KEEP THIS BETWEEN US!
This isn't public knowledge. I may talk about it some day but I'm happy to show you the stats I brought to that meeting.
[http://www.wauterboi.com/peen/016-a_stats_for_ya.jpg]
Okay see that number in the total column? Those are total weekly downloads
Here's something most people don't know: we pre-recorded a lot of episodes on Biggest Problem because Dax was constantly going on vacation: Disneyland, Six Flags, Burning Man, improv shows, camping trips, sketch shows, Indy 500, Burning Man again, aquarium trips, etc... the largest week-to-week decline in listeners was when he bossed everyone around and forced us to record 3 episodes before he left for burning man. The episodes sounded stale and people hated them. That's when we dropped almost 9,000 listeners in one week.
How do you think we released weekly episodes even when he was gone to burning man for 2 weeks at a time? Who do you think stayed behind and did all that work?
Anyway, I want you to look at the weekly numbers for episode 77, 78, 79 and 80
IT WAS CONSTANT
No joke dude, he was leaving almost every other weekend. The dude hates work. I was doing all of it
So when the numbers started to slip, I told him I couldn't justify working so much on this podcast. And when he became abusive and started yelling and screaming and cussing me out, then dating my ex behind my back, then talking behind my back, all that shit adds up...
Right, he hates it. Also, he doesn't do much work. The site looks sloppy. He hasn't delivered on most of his Patreon promises. He only got a news girl after Jesse P-S called him out for lying to his fans. He raised 15k to take the show on the road, yet still no show. His site even got hacked because he doesn't update wordpress
Did you know his site got hacked?
dick show
http://maddox.xmission.com/what_really_happened_biggest/hacked_site.jpg
Yeah, not sure it takes 3 months and $50,000 to set up a road trip, but okay.
But yeah, he does very little work. That's why he pays people to produce content for him: Dustin, Asterios, thumbnails, you, News Girl, Peach, etc, etc.
There is nobody in his life who isn't tied financially to him, save for his life coach Dan.
Oh and he's paying Sean too, almost forgot to mention him. He's paying Sean a lot to make it worth his while. Sean used to do my show for next to nothing because he liked working with me and I liked working with him, even after the split.
Anyway do you still have that graphic open? With the numbers from biggest problem?
I want you to look at the weekly downloads for 79, 78 and 77
See how after 3 and 1/2 weeks, episode 78 only had 32k downloads? 79 had 30k downloads. Episode 77 had 36k downloads (the one without Dax)
Those numbers are pretty bad... down from around 40-50k from earlier
See that?
Okay
Yep, in part
And the other big decline was with women: I never brought this up on the show, but we were losing lots of women. My Maddox fan page had a 70/30 split with male to women. Biggest problem over time became 95% male because of Dax. I told him to tone down the misogynistic stuff, but he wouldn't let up, and we lost a lot of women. I have so many comments from women saying they couldn't stand listening to the show anymore.
Now I want to show you the numbers from my new show for comparison. Want to see?
[http://www.wauterboi.com/peen/016-a_stats_for_ya2.jpg]
Those are my numbers now. My new show is doing better than biggest problem was near the end. I now have tons of female listeners, not just the same handful. I've booked much bigger guests, like the creator of Metalocalypse, Dia Frampton, movie producers, journalists, writers, video game developers, etc. I've done far better with the new podcast on my own. And my numbers are higher than biggest problem. There's my "failing podcast" for you.
So near the end, biggest problem was struggling to crack 30k downloads, and now on my own, I'm already pushing 43k. And that's even after months of Dax's lies and slander. I definitely lost some subscribers because some people don't like the new show, but the people who stayed love it, and I got a ton of new fans as well. The show has a life of its own. I'm so glad I didn't bog it down with gossip or obsessing about Dax and the old show like he has.
Thank you
Anyway, I hope you can see why I don't really care to address the lies and rumors and bullshit. He wants to bog me down with that stuff so my podcast audience gets alienated like his. Nobody knows what the fuck he's talking about anymore, unless you've been listening to all of the biggest problem and have followed 3 years of gossip and drama. It's exhausting. And honestly? Not that interesting. Biggest Problem was good for a while, but the truth of the matter is this: it wasn't the Seinfeld of podcasts. It was a failing podcast with an abusive co-host who wasn't doing any work, and when I saw him talking behind my back and saying he was using me for money, I had enough and the podcast ended.
It's a podcast that ended almost a year ago, and I'm so tired of talking about it. It's just not that interesting. I've moved on, and so has everyone else other than the handful of obsessed dick warts. I'm just trying to produce great content, not attack Dax and Asterios like they are doing to me. It's sad at this point.
I'm glad you finally saw that he lied to you directly.
I don't know anything about it, but I know it's mean-spirited and Asterios has lost a lot of friends
And he manipulated the vote to get it charting on iTunes. My show got #3 organically without pre-sales and without a vote manipulation campaign. Plus I also sold episodes on Amazon and my own website which doesn't count on iTunes.
That was unprovoked. I haven't said anything about Asterios publicly, but man I have a ton of shit on that guy. He's almost as bad as Dax. Don't believe anything he says.
Yep
And I haven't even said anything about him.
He and Dax hate each other. That's the funniest part. I don't even want to release the text messages he sent me because it would show everyone how two-faced he is and he'd have to stop working with Dax, but I don't want him to because they hate each other and I'm enjoying secretly knowing that. hahaha. I want them to keep using each other for as long as possible
Cool, how's that suicide pool going? Any hot new jokes about my "chimp" girlfriend, or my finances or mental health? Any more autism or mental retardation jokes? Any other schemes to hurt my livelihood?
I don't look at anything in there except what people send me. It's toxic. I know there was also some kind of pool to shut down my podcast because they are obsessed losers who can't leave me alone
Everything there is spiteful and mean spirited. "the power of spite compels you"
#spiteismite
There's no such thing as laughing from afar. That's like laughing from afar at bullying and harassment instead of standing up against it
You have the luxury to point and laugh because it's not affecting you
The main difference is that this isn't youtube drama. This isn't ongoing between two people. I haven't been engaging with it. And you know me. And by being in the forums, and contributing content to it, you become a part of it
Even youtube drama has its limits and people call them out for being mean-spirited bullies, even against people like leafy
It's all awful
You got all paranoid that you might lose some income if I drop the nuclear option
Yet you take part in a forum where people are actively trying to hurt my livelihood. How is that fair?
The dick warts made me lose a sponsor for nothing I did. That's fucking bullshit
That's taking food off my table
Harry's
They've been dishing it out
That would be me dishing it back. I've stayed quiet this whole time and that 3 minute video doesn't begin to explain my side of the story
And there won't be dishing back because some people will end up in jail. It's far worse than you think.
Same as yours, I just use basic vi
vim
I use multiple shell windows rather than split vim, never figured that out really and found it to be easier to use the OS tabbing rather than internal windows
I just read through your code
Man what was frustrating in my computer science classes was having to write something like that with C++ when I could essentially create that entire program with 2-3 lines of shell script + AWK
I've gotta learn python, it's the back-end to Blender
Hmm, looks like a mixture between shell scripting and Perl
I miss the Perl days... Perl intimidated too many people I think.
This is valid Perl code: [the exporter for these DM's really destroyed whatever symbol explosion was here. pretty sure it was a regex]
I don't mind semicolons and syntax between languages too much. I adapt fairly quickly
I feel like I can code in any language, even languages I've never tried before. I can pick up new languages like nothing. It's all syntax. The logic is what matters. Take a Discrete Mathematics class if you haven't already... that's where I really learned how to program.
Aye
It's good to know
Especially because of jquery
Buddy, stop
Literally nobody is still talking about this other than the dick warts. Just take a break man. You need to get out of that little bubble of idiots. You're better than this
Okay thanks for telling me. Do you listen to best debate?
Cool
If you listened to best debate, I think you'd have your answer
You gotta get out of that toxic hive mind man
It's not healthy
You'll realize why once you take a break from it for a week or two, I promise
Didn't I already say "nothing personal, but I'm done talking about Biggest Problem. It's time everyone moved on"?
Thanks
No idea hahah. It was one of about 30 different covers
It's a long process. Honestly there's so much more work that goes into writing a book than what the public sees. For alphabet of Manliness, there were 3 pages I wrote got every one that made it into the book
Thanks for the heads up
How did you find it?
Thanks for telling me. The reason I ask is because I'm afraid the stalker/dickwarts might have found it...
I wish you would have contacted me first, Dax and Asterios are stalking me
But I appreciate it nonetheless, good looking out
How are things?
What would you like to be doing?
Have you looked at elance? https://www.elance.com/php/landing/main/login.php
Yeah man, it'll probably take 4-7 years to build enough connections, but you can slowly grow your rolodex of freelance contacts who will refer you, if you do a good job, to other clients and get more and bigger gigs that way
or you might luck out and land a big gig right away
but it takes time and a portfolio with lots of experience
No. Jesus, I haven't done anything. I'm tired of talking about this.
There is no "defense" or side of the story because I haven't told mine. I don't care about the dickwarts or any of Dax's bullshit lies. I haven't talked about him in public at all except for a 3 minute video. Time for everyone to move on. I don't have time for this drama. This is 100% him. He's completely obsessed with me. He needs serious psychotherapy. He tweets about me every fucking day. How do you not see who the problem child is? Seriously?
Also you said you'd stop supporting him after I showed you the quote of him saying a guy who fucks a passed out girl isn't a rapist... so what are you doing?
[http://www.wauterboi.com/peen/021-earlier_chatlog.jpg]
He said that. I proved it to you. And you're still supporting him? There it is in your own words, you said you wouldn't support him if he said that. And he did.
Dick lies about everything. He lied about why the show ended. He lied about the finances. He lied directly to YOU in an email. What more is there to discuss?
I haven't done anything wrong and don't have anything to apologize for. Peace.
You're leaking my private conversations that you promised not to share now? Coward.
Okay, enough is enough. I'm doing what I have to do.
You broke your word to me.
I have no idea what cocaine thing you're talking about, it's all bullshit and heresay. I literally have no idea what you're talking about. All you dickwarts act like everyone knows what's being said on the show. We don't know because we don't listen.
You guys are obsessed
and now people are going to lose their jobs because of you.
You have no idea what the "nuclear" option is. It isn't drugs. Not by a long shot.
Do you want this to happen?
Then stop it. Fix this bullshit. Since you lied to me, I guess you don't have a problem lying. Say that leak is fake and then leave me the fuck alone.
Because you want to save people's jobs?
No
I don't want anything from you.
Well you're already the "mean" one by leaking my private conversation.
You PROMISED me dude.
Isaias. You promised me.
Why not? You lied to me.
You listen to liars.
You'd rather save your pride than save people's jobs?
FOR WHAT?
I have done NOTHING
You're the bully. You're forcing me to go public by leaking my conversation. You broke your promise and now you have to face the consequences and live with people's lives getting fucked up forever.
What if I started directing my fans to start attacking him and Asterios and you and everyone's livelihood?
